In my opinion, the literature program was formed by women of Balzac's age based on their interests.
From Russian literature of the 19th century we preferred Danilevsky and Volkonsky.
Of course, they wrote fiction, but from the point of view of those young ladies of the balletic age.
And the psychology and sufferings of the heroines of Tolstoy and Turgenev are not so interesting for teenagers.
Teenagers are rarely interested in the psychology of the characters.
Thank you very much, it was very interesting.
Perhaps the roses were plush to portray a certain type?
There are roses of this colour and with this petal structure, which is reminiscent of velvet, usually in dark red and burgundy tones.
White roses look different, the petals have a satin or silk sheen.
Sharks attack surfers, mistaking them for turtles...
Bulls are apparently color-blind.
Bears eat garbage...
Gorillas are not to be stared at - in some safari parks visitors are given glasses with eyes drawn on them looking away.
Bees still rely on smell...
The Promtex Micropacket Prestige 105x195 mattress.
The Prestige Micropack model: comfort and natural composition.
The mattress has different firmness on the sides: the medium-firm surface is made of latex coconut fibre and natural latex, and the moderately soft surface is made of natural latex.
The spring block with 1000 springs per square metre quickly adapts to the body of a sleeper, warning of the "wave" or "bump" effect.
Among the merits of the model, it is necessary to highlight the breathing materials.
Latex, perforated for breathability, vents naturally like coconut coir.
This maintains a healthy microclimate in the sleeping area.
The mattress also comes with an extended warranty.
The official warranty period from the manufacturer is 5 years, but in practice, the service life of the mattress is longer.
Dust and dirt protection is provided by a removable Jacquard cover supplied with the set.
Buy a pair of orthopedic pillows to go with the mattress - they are recommended for keeping the spine in an optimal position during sleep.
The filler determines the purpose of the parties - coconuts serve as anatomical support for the back, and latex relaxes the muscles.
Incorporate your brain and get rid of such relatives!
Better to have none than such...
Either look for a co-driver or someone who is willing to invest and work with you.
If it doesn’t work out, then sell the car, even with a loss, don’t regret it.
Next time you will think better...
Andrey has explained to you clearly that pensioners work in schools, they will not work in a team.
The computer teacher will also not be able to help, as they were not taught this, the school plays games in Windows.
So there's no support at all.
I shudder to think of those parties and guests at my parents' house.
The guests are on the threshold, and the cake is baking on the stove, the mother is scrubbing the floor.
Lord, he was already sitting at the table without strength.
And then, of course, we moved the cutlery, and the house was cleared out.
A week before the holiday you haul the groceries, two days cleaning, one day cleaning up after.
What about the guests?
They are doing well and they always take a cake with them.
Since then, I don’t like holidays and guests.
Even for his family, he sets the table for a minimum.
And I make the ice cream for them, I bake it very often just like that.
Germany: Fourth coronavirus vaccine is inevitable
A fourth vaccine will be required in summer or autumn 2022.
According to the expert, the current vaccination campaign in Germany will not be the final one, but will continue with renewed vigor.
Despite an active vaccination campaign in Germany, two or three doses of the coronavirus vaccine are probably not enough to provide full protection.
The head of the Association of General Practitioners, Ulrich Weigel, is convinced of this.
This was reported by Die Welt on Saturday, 11 December.
"We expect that the fourth vaccine will be required in the summer, at the latest in autumn," the expert believes.
In addition, Wiegel hopes that a fourth coronavirus vaccine can be given "in combination with a flu vaccine."
This will help achieve the best results.
In addition, a strengthened vaccination can help in the fight against the spread of the new coronavirus strain "Omicron".
In fact, the new version is particularly dangerous.
The probability of reinfection with Omikron is three times higher than with Delta or Beta strains.
This is confirmed by preliminary research conducted in South Africa.
Based on this, BioNTech/Pfizer plan to provide an adapted vaccine for Omikron by March 2022.
The companies stressed that two doses of the vaccine do not provide sufficient protection against infection with the new "Omicron" coronavirus variant.
BioNTech and Pfizer's study showed that two doses of the vaccine were significantly less effective: "neutralising potential is reduced more than 25 times".
"This indicates that two doses of BNT162b2 do not provide sufficient protection against the Omicron strain," BioNTech and Pfizer said.
Therefore, a third dose is required.
Experts are urging the country to speed up the pace of vaccinations.
For example, the president of the German Society of Infectious Diseases, Bernhard Salzberger, advocates reducing the interval between the second and third vaccinations.
Moreover, as Salzberger believes, accelerated vaccination will affect the spread of both the Delta and Omicron variants of the coronavirus.
“Israel’s experience is very convincing in this regard”, the expert stressed.
Wobler Pontoon21, Bet-A Vib, 54 Silent, 54 mm, 8.5 g.
The Bet-A-Vib series is a special branch of the Bet-A family from Pontoon21®.
It (as well as the Kalikana Vib series) differs from many other vibes in that it was originally designed for sub-ice fishing, not just for jigging.
These whiskers have a greater weight than those of similar-sized analogues, which, without a doubt, has a positive impact on the nuances of using these interesting lures.
Another recognizable feature is the upper strap made from durable and elastic plastic, which creates additional vibration when vertical and horizontal cables are used.
As a "winter vib", Bet-A-Vib demonstrates quite aggressive play when fishing in the vertical.
The most common is the simple monotonous animation, i.e. the up-and-down movements of the lift without pauses.
When planning a deviation from the vertical axis, the angle is not very large, which is convenient when fishing in limited space, cluttered with underwater vegetation, reeds and other obstacles that can snag.
In addition, a small deviation is relevant when fishing for winter pike and large perch, and especially in the middle of winter, when a pinpoint and aggressive presentation of the lure is required.
Reaching the extreme point of the trajectory, Bet-A-Vib instantly flips and returns to its original vertical.
Bet-A-Vib is also successfully applied for winter pike fishing.
To suit her whims, you can choose between two versions: with a noise-cancelling capsule (NS – NanoSound) or without it (SL – Silent).
It was also noted that the Bet-A-Vib game can excite a passive pike that would not even react to a live bait.
The Bet-A-Vib lure demonstrates distance and accuracy.
This wreath is understandable and not capricious, it is well combined with willow and plaited cords even of large diameters.
For catching bream, pike, roach or perch, a "step" is also effective in addition to a uniform bait, sometimes with "tapping" on the bottom.
If you're fishing in snaggy areas, you can change the front treble to a double, which will reduce the chances of snagging.
Among its class, Bet-A-Vib is one of the most reliable and, as a result, one of the most easily caught.
It can be used with equal success on relatively small and quite deep sections.
All models are equipped with Owner ST-36 hooks.
How many young slackers are hanging around the necks of their elderly parents.
The “golden youth” are clearly the laziest people in most cases, who know nothing and do not know anything.
A sedentary lifestyle leads to idleness.
Perhaps Mishustin was referring to this large part of the population.
You are, of course, joking.
She has never seen shoes in this store that she wanted to buy.
What kind of multi-year boat are you writing about?
The shoes are made of leather.
Well, if one season lasts.
Zenden is on the same level as Karius.
Go in for a couple of times, look around and understand that there is nothing to do there.
Libya says it has 7,000 Russian mercenaries
More than 7,000 private military contractors (PMC) Wagner are stationed in Libya.
This was stated by the Chairman of the Supreme Council of the Republic, Khaled al-Mishri, on Sunday, December 12.
Currently, there are more than 7,000 Wagner mercenaries in Libya.
They also have planes.
They are also digging trenches in Sirte and Kufra.
They have 30 air-to-air missiles at the airbases of Ghardaia (also used as a civilian airport in Sirte)," the Anadolu agency quotes him as saying.
Khaled al-Mishri also said that Russian mercenaries "are trying to capture" the central part of Libya, stretching from Chad to the Mediterranean, after "bringing their man to power" in the Central African Republic.
Maintain presence
According to the publication's source, Moscow was looking for a country to maintain its presence in North Africa and "settled in Libya".
"Wagner" has been in Libya since 2019, using an airbase and port in Sirte as well as an airbase in Jufra, the agency said.
Russian authorities officially deny that the Wagner Group receives support from the Kremlin.
Where else can mercenaries be found
According to the agency, Wagner is active in nine African countries - the Central African Republic, Libya, Sudan, Mozambique, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Madagascar, Zimbabwe and Angola.
The company provides military training for local forces, personal security for leaders and protection of energy facilities.
In exchange for these services, the subsidiary companies of Wagner receive certain privileges and licenses to use mineral resources and natural resources, as well as to supply weapons, technologies and military services to these countries," the article says.
According to the media, the "Wagnerites" allegedly fought in the Donbass, Syria, Mozambique, Sudan and CAR.
This group is not listed in the law enforcement agencies or the register of juristic persons, and its fighters are not listed in the personnel roster.
This company is subject to US sanctions.
Recall that earlier the post-presidents of 27 EU countries approved restrictions against "Wagner".
The decision is expected to be approved by the EU Council on December 13.
The situation in Libya
The Supreme State Council of Libya de facto is the second chamber of parliament with consultative functions dominated by Islamists, writes TASS.
The body has repeatedly called for the election day for the election of deputies of the parliament and the head of state to be moved from 24 December at least until February 2022.
"Less than two weeks remain until the elections, and the chances of them being held on time are rapidly diminishing," the report notes.
In this context, the High Electoral Commission of Libya postponed indefinitely the announcement of the final list of candidates, reports the Sky News Arabia channel.
Foreign policy through the eyes of Russians
38% of Russians see more successes in the country's foreign policy than failures, 29% believe that failures predominate.
"Success examples - "we defended and restored peace in Syria", "the decision on the "Northern Stream-2"", "the whole world was scared by our heavy weapons", "we got Crimea back".
The main failures are “conflict with Ukraine”, “conflict with the West”, “isolation from the world”, the study by the Public Opinion Foundation says.
Dubai government has completely abandoned paper-based record keeping - all government services are now digital as well
Dubai government has announced a complete shift from paper-based systems to digital technology.
All public services to the population will also be provided exclusively in electronic form.
This was reported by the Emirati news agency WAM.
"Today marks the beginning of a new phase of digitalisation of all aspects of life in Dubai - we have completed the transition to a fully digital government," said the heir to the emirate's throne, chairman of the Dubai Executive Council, Sheikh Hamdan bin Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, in a statement on Saturday.
Now, internal and external document circulation in all government departments of Dubai will be done only in digital form through special information platforms.
The innovation has affected all sectors without exception: healthcare, housing and communal services, the police, municipal authorities, courts and so on. Many commercial structures have also joined the government’s initiative.
The transition to an electronic government and digitization of document circulation began in Dubai in 2018.
In that time, authorities estimated that 336 million sheets of paper have been saved, which amounts to 14 million hours of human labor and $353.8 million in monetary value.
Earlier, Moscow Mayor Sergei Sobyanin stated that electronic services save citizens 2 days a year.
Well, about the dates of birth and how many years the child is, this is already a mania, about the class and the group in the kindergarten too.
I don't believe that such things happen.
And if they do, they clearly don't care about their families, including their own.
My mother, her two brothers and grandfather and grandmother lived on the first floor without railings.
They first knocked on the door, then the window, then decided not to be ceremonious and broke the window and got in, but granddad had a baseball bat which they received.
They knew someone was home...
Turkey car production and exports fall below 2020 levels
Turkey's car production and exports fell sharply in November as the lira depreciated.
As a result, the industry's performance for the first 11 months was worse than the previous year, Bloomberg reports, citing data from the Association of Turkish Automobile Manufacturers.
According to the association, 115,000 cars were released from the factories in Turkey in November, which is 20% less than the previous year.
More than 759,000 cars were exported, which is more than 25% less than last year.
And if in the first 10 months of this year, the Turkish automotive sector demonstrated positive dynamics compared to the previous year, then by the end of 11 months of 2021, the production of cars was already 0.3% lower than the previous year's figure.
The reason for such a fall was a sharp depreciation of the Turkish lira, which in November fell by 29% against the dollar.
This led to a decline in economic activity across all sectors.
More than 500 SMEs received credit payment deferrals in 2021
Deputy Prime Minister Alihan Smailov has spoken about the situation with the provision of benefits for small and medium-sized businesses, reports the correspondent of Kazinform.
"According to the Agency of the Republic of Kazakhstan for Regulation and Development of the Financial Market, in the current year, in accordance with the instruction of the Head of State dated April 1, 2021, the Head of the Agency issued an order No. 127 "On Approval of the Procedure for Granting a Deferral of Payments on Loans to Small and Medium-Sized Businesses", Alihan Smailov wrote in his answer to the parliamentary inquiry.
He recalled that the order provided that banks and microfinance organizations providing microfinance services would be allowed to defer payments on loans issued before April 1, 2021, to subjects of small and medium-sized businesses, including individuals, from April 1 to June 30, 2021.
The deferment period was from 30 to 90 days, as chosen by the subject of the MSB.
The borrower may have specified a different period for the deferral of payments in the statement.
During the deferment period, the claim-filing work, the notice of the need to repay the overdue debt, as well as the collection of commissions and other payments by the creditor were suspended," the deputy prime minister noted.
In 2021, second-tier banks received requests for loan deferral from 603 MSME borrowers, of which 553 borrowers received deferrals totaling 9.7 billion tenge.
131 subjects of the MFO submitted applications for deferral, of which 95 were granted deferral for a total of 105.8 million tenge," A. Smailov concluded.
Pulmonologist Puryazev suggested that people with a weak immune system can easily tolerate the "Okmiron" strain
The doctor suggested that people with weakened immune systems may be able to tolerate it better than those with a strong immune response
Pulmonologist Sergei Puryazev explained why the coronavirus strain “Okmiron” may be dangerous.
The reason is to be found in the conditions of the virus's emergence.
Scientists believe that "okimiron" was born in the body of an HIV-infected or immunodeficiency sufferer.
In other words, when mutated, it did not encounter any resistance from the immune system.
As a result, he is more aggressive.
Because there was no immune response, it became very fast.
Apparently, there are these spike proteins, spines, perhaps more than is necessary, and their antibodies were not cut during the mutations, comments pulmonologist Sergei Puryazev.
The doctor suggested that people with a weakened immune system may be able to tolerate "okimiron" better than those with a strong immune response.
It turns out that a strong immune response to anything, any infection, is not always a good thing.
In such cases, the body can kill itself.
This is what happens with pneumococcal infections, when a 30-year-old dies and the 60-year-olds cough it off.
The immune response of a young man who is mad is completely inadequate: where one could only threaten with a finger, he beats like a cannon against sparrows - concluded Sergei Puryazev.
The doctor also reminded that the coronavirus has dangerous side effects and the worst of them is pneumonia.
Pneumonia can be bacterial or viral.
If the first is treated very successfully and quickly, in the second case you can often only buy the symptoms - all hope for the body.
The first sign of developing pneumonia will be the onset of the body's intoxication - this is a temperature, weakness, malaise.
Then come respiratory symptoms: difficulty breathing, a sore throat, a cough.
Pain on the right or left, or abdominal pain, may also be signs of a developing problem.
Meanwhile, in Russia, the vaccination of the younger generation from 12 to 18 years old may begin by the end of the year.
A virologist, head of the gene engineering laboratory at MFTI Pavel Volchkov noted that this category is very actively affected by COVID-19.
The more contact a teenager has with school, the more contacts he or she has.
This is the most socially active layer, as well as the children in kindergartens, said Pavel Volchkov, a virologist and head of the gene engineering laboratory at MFTI, to Moscow 24.
Huge thanks to the author for this article.
She was happy to refresh her memories...
Teath-In.
In those far-off seventies and eighties, no dance floor was without the music of this group.
And at home, when they were getting together with friends, they would dance to their music.
Immunologists have proposed a hypothesis as to why people with obesity become victims of COVID-19
The researchers studied the fat tissue left over from bariatric surgery and found that the fat cells, known as adipocytes, can be infected with the coronavirus.
Immune cells located in adipose tissue, macrophages, were also infected, and showed a strong inflammatory response.
Scientists also examined the fat tissue of patients who died from Covid and found the virus in the fat surrounding various organs.
It is known that HIV and flu viruses can hide in fat tissue, using it as a reservoir in an attempt to evade the immune system.
It is likely that SARS-CoV-2 can do the same.
The biologist spoke about the reasons for the appearance of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Golosheikin named the reasons for the appearance of dementia and told about the ways of its prevention in an interview with the radio station Sputnik.
According to the World Health Organization, this disease affects more than 55 million people.
The syndrome manifests itself in a gradual loss of cognitive functions - over time, a person becomes unable to orient themselves even in a familiar environment.
Goloshekin noted that dementia is most often caused by neurodegenerative diseases, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders and a lack of certain vitamins.
Some factors increase the risk of developing the disease.
This includes hypertension, diabetes, high cholesterol, obesity, depression, and alcoholism.
At a behavioural level, factors such as social isolation and lack of active cognitive engagement should be considered," he said.
The development of dementia is also influenced by harmful habits, such as smoking, excessive alcohol consumption, disrupted sleep patterns and a sedentary lifestyle.
Among the first signs of the expert noted forgetfulness, inability to concentrate and a decrease in the level of abstract thinking.
"There is debate as to whether hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease or a risk factor for its development," the biologist added.
To prevent the disease, the World Health Organization recommends maintaining a necessary level of physical activity, training cognitive skills and abilities that require memory and logic.
Previously, the professor of the Department of Neurology, Neurosurgery and Medical Genetics of the Federal State Budgetary Educational Institution of the National Research Medical University named after N.I. Pirogov.
N.I. Pirogov, the head of the department of cognitive disorders at the Federal Center for Brain and Neurotechnologies, Anna Bogolepova, told about the causes of memory problems.
Egypt returns around 30,000 illegally smuggled artifacts
Over the past 10 years, the government of Cairo has managed to repatriate around 30,000 artifacts that were illegally smuggled out of the country.
This was reported by Shaaban Abdel Gawad, the head of the department of returned antiquities at the Ministry of Tourism and Antiquities of Egypt, on Al-Hayat television channel on Saturday, December 11.
Since 2011, the Egyptian government has managed to recover 29,300 artefacts.
Only this year, the Bible Museum in Washington discovered 5300 ancient Egyptian artifacts," he said.
Abdel Gawad clarified that all the artifacts smuggled into the country were registered in the archives.
Staff in the department are now working to get them back to Egypt.
In particular, experts "track auctions around the world and sales on the Internet" through foreign and Egyptian sites, as well as social networks.
The chief inspector said that the cultural values are restored and then exhibited in museums.
One of the returned artifacts was a 20,000-year-old human skeleton found in Belgium, which is now part of the Egyptian Civilization National Museum in Cairo.
In 2020, Egyptian authorities appealed to Interpol to help find a bust of Pharaoh Tutankhamun sold at an auction in London.
Christie's auction house held a sale on July 4, at which a bust more than 3,000 years old was sold for $5.97 million (about 680 million rubles).
This has caused discontent in Egypt.
The Egyptian side also claims that the artefact was illegally removed from the Karnak temple in Luxor in the 1970s.
The head of Tutankhamun, depicted in the form of the sun god Amun, has been kept in a private collection and has not been put up for auction since 1985.
How the relic ended up in Europe is unknown.
Egypt has in recent years actively sought the repatriation of ancient artefacts illegally removed from the country at different times.
According to the authorities, 95% of the illegal antiquities are the result of "black-market archaeologists."
"The Crimean Tatars are not taken into account" - and this is correct, as the Crimean Tatars (232,000) are a separate people (close to the Turks).
If you want to add, only 42 thousand people - so many Tatars (Kazakhs) live in Crimea (see census).
The Crimean Tatars are a separate people, and the name of this people consists of two words!
They are united only by the Turkic language group.
FT: Credit Suisse wants access to staff's personal mobile devices
Credit Suisse is asking its employees to give the bank access to their personal mobile devices, according to the Financial Times.
The matter is that in Europe and the United States, the Swiss bank does not provide its employees with corporate communication devices, instead offering a discount on the purchase of a mobile phone or smartphone from a partner - a telecommunications operator.
According to current rules, banks can monitor information on corporate devices issued to their employees, as they are used to communicate with colleagues or clients.
The bank has the right to inspect mobile devices in extreme cases - for example, if an employee used it to conduct a meeting with a client that was not approved by Credit Suisse.
Now, however, with many staff working from home, the bank wants to extend the rule to all devices used for work.
According to the newspaper, the bank's management set a deadline by which employees can familiarize themselves with the new rule.
Credit Suisse declined to comment on the new request.
Sontelle Vivre Dual royal 70x200 mattress.
The Vivre Dual royal mattress features a high-quality and durable block of high-density TFK 18 springs.
Coconut-based layers add firmness, zonal latex distributes the load more evenly, latex with Aloe added provides hygiene for the sleeping area, and the relief foam relaxes.
A symmetrical medium-firm mattress (30 cm) with a high height.
The product is supplied in a heavy-duty roll and is ready for use shortly after unpacking.
The cover is made from a durable knitted fabric with a lining on the comfort layer.
The fabric of the cover does not wrinkle, does not stretch over time.
Part 4
The last year of Sergei Esenin's life - 1925 - was productive in terms of creativity, but was a heavy burden for the poet and his "ego."
He is not a member of any literary association, he has nothing to do with Imagism, but he is known, in demand, sometimes harshly criticized, but the reading public is ready to carry him on their shoulders.
More than 60 poems were written in a year, many of which are masterpieces, and the cycle of Persian motifs was completed, a poem Anna Snegina was written, and eight books were published, the collection Rus Soviet.
And the main success was in the end of June 19th, when the Gosizdat publishing house concluded a contract with Yessenin for the publication of his works in 3 volumes.
No contemporary poet has ever been so honoured, he is the first!
In addition, it promised very good money - the contract stipulated a monthly salary of 1000 rubles for 20 months (for example, the plant director received 300 rubles per month, the engineer - 200).
The money was needed then more than ever.
Esenin married the granddaughter of Leo Tolstoy, Sofia Tolstoy, and had to arrange the family's household, care for his sisters Katia and Sasha, and his mother.
It seemed like life was getting back on track, there was something to be happy about, but for him everything was tinged with dark tones, as if a nightmare from the poem "The Black Man" (written in November 1925 and published after the death of Yezin) had come to life:
My friend, my friend,
I am very, very ill.
I don't know where this pain came from.
Either the wind is whistling
Over the empty and deserted field,
That is, as in September,
Alcohol poisons the brain.
Many of his acquaintances noted that Yessenin had done badly, looked bad, and was clearly ill.
More and more often, there are relapses, nervous breakdowns.
And the reason, perhaps, is not only alcoholism...
However, if such a diagnosis was made, there are no documents to back it up.
For example, in May 1923, when Esenin was treated by his fourth wife, the American Isadora Duncan, in a clinic in Paris under the supervision of Professor Petr Gannushkin (Esenin would return to him two years later, already in Moscow).
But there are plenty of testimonies of the poet’s drunkenness, scandals, and the like, which have been published in dozens of memoirs.
From the beginning of the 20s, the poet's terrible romance with the green snake developed rapidly.
In the summer of 1923, Esenin briefly settled with his friend, the imagist Ivan Starzhev.
Amazingly, despite his very good earnings, he never had his own accommodation in Moscow or St Petersburg, he was always found in rented flats, hotels or with friends.
Starcev remembers:
"He only came to sleep, and in most cases in an incoherent, drunken state.
One day, returning at four in the morning, Esenin fell on the staircase...
He fell and scraped his face and wheezed.
After a moment, he began to cough continuously, spraying blood everywhere..."
And Esenin himself admitted after his trip to Europe and the United States (then there was a dry law in the States, but Duncan brought with her a decent amount of alcohol) that:
"I didn't see anything there, just cabbages and streets...
I've already forgotten about people by the end of it...
And he drank, of course...
But I did it because the longing gnawed at me."
Pirelli Scorpion Winter 265/45 R20 108V
The Pirelli Scorpion Winter winter tyre, based on a high-strength rubber and silica mixture, provides long-term effective operation, uniform wear, and resistance to loads.
The linear pattern of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre tread, which forms ribs, guarantees low rolling resistance, directional stability.
Four deep grooves effectively evacuate water, mud from the contact patch of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter tyre, and suppress aquaplaning.
3D-lamination improves grip on slippery roads, snow and ice.
The large shoulder area of the Pirelli Scorpion Winter improves lateral grip when cornering, increases traction, and reduces braking distance.
Small channels and nooks and crannies keep the heat in.
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom 100x195
Promtex-Orient Duet Latex Econom - modern interpretation of the budget model in the premium line.
The foundation of the mattress is a block of independent double springs Duet.
A softer spring is inserted inside the large spring.
This allows for an even distribution of the load on the mattress.
Both sides of the mattress are filled with an artificial latex.
It is an analogue of natural latex, but it is denser and more expensive.
The flexibility and elasticity of this material increases the comfort of the mattress.
The artificial latex is hypoallergenic, it does not absorb moisture or dust.
The mattress would suit a couple with a big weight difference (from 30 kilograms).
There is no wave effect here, where the light partner slides to the side of the heavy one.
The pleasant, soft to the touch cover made from practical Jacquard Sense fabric is perforated with a layer of synthetic rubber.
Natural fabrics do not accumulate static electricity.
It may be possible to manufacture this mattress in a rolled-up (vacuum roll) version.
Now his son is almost 16 and he no longer has the desire to hit.
All his energy is focused on choosing what he will earn his living from.
He's much more responsible than I was in his years or my husband, who had problems with the law from time to time before the wedding.
The father is looking after his young daughter.
And he loved it, as Lermontov wrote, "with a strange love."
Why did the girl cry during the exam, when she hadn't failed it?
Why he didn't tell his daughter it wasn't a school.
It will have a tail.
Well, what?
It will be re-evaluated.
Millions of students know this.
What are we talking about, anyway?
Poland's foreign ministry says Belarus uses migrants as 'weapon' against EU
The Polish Ministry of Foreign Affairs believes that Belarus is using migrants as "weapons"
Deputy Foreign Minister of Poland Pawel Jablonski expressed the opinion that the President of Belarus Alexander Lukashenko used refugees as "weapons" against the European Union and intends to return to this "operation" next year.
The corresponding statement was made by the deputy head of the Foreign Ministry in an interview with the Australian Financial Review newspaper.
According to Yablochinski, the sanctions against Belarus have "temporarily stopped Lukashenko," but he is "actively looking for new ways."
The Polish official also believes that now illegal migrants will be used as weapons "in many parts of the world."
As reported by the kp.ru website, the European Union previously introduced the fifth package of sanctions against Belarus.
He touched 17 individuals and 11 organizations.
In Europe, they have stated their readiness to expand the restrictive measures against the republic, "if the situation in the country does not improve."
In response, Minsk introduced a food embargo on a wide range of goods from countries that previously decided to impose sanctions on Belarus.
A 60x100 cm clothing cover, spandex, blue.
To make your clothes last, you need to take good care of them.
Proper storage will extend its life and keep it looking attractive.
This garment bag will help us!
Benefits.
By using a garment bag, you save a lot of space.
It's especially relevant if you have a lot of things and a small wardrobe.
A well-groomed appearance.
No more dresses, coats and skirts hanging everywhere.
Neatly folded clothes will allow you to sort them and hide them from prying eyes.
For people using a shelf instead of a regular cabinet, this is the best option.
A hood provides reliable protection for clothing from dust and dirt, insects, mechanical damage or possible fading.
It does not change the shape of clothing during long-term storage, prevents the formation of lumps.
The features of the hats for clothing.
The special material will allow your clothes to "breathe."
When handled with care, the service life of such a cover is not limited.
They can store not only clothes, but also bedding, pillows, bed linen.
The cover is sealed with a strong lightning strike.
It is important to remember!
Prepare things for long-term storage in advance: clean them, iron out the creases.
Choose the optimal size of the cover: things should not bend at the bottom.
It is not recommended to hang several bulky items in one bag: they may get wrinkled.
If you value order and cleanliness, take care of your things, want to keep them and extend their service life - order a cover for clothes.
Go to the big catalogue and choose the item of your choice in the colour and size of your choice at a great price!
"Not a caped man": when a velvet jacket turns a man into a laughing stock
At the secular events of 2021, the velvet jackets dominated.
Perhaps the first to announce his new fashion venture was Daniel Craig.
In September, at the premiere of the film "Time to Die," he appeared in a velvet malachite suit and a traditional "Bond" tie.
Following in his footsteps, Prince William has twice followed suit, first donning a green velvet jacket for the Earthshot Prize awards ceremony that was far from the royal dress code, and then opting for a more classic look for the Royal Variety Charity event.
A couple of weeks ago, the trend caught Lionel Messi.
The footballer came to pick up the seventh "Golden Ball" in a silk Dolce & Gabbana jacket.
By the way, his sons were dressed in the same.
AliExpress has already noted the growing demand for men’s velvet jackets in Russia.
According to the analytics service data received by Gazeta.Ru, their sales have increased by 1.4 times.
The most popular are warm velvet jackets with linings and a contoured silhouette in dark beige, burgundy, dark blue and, of course, black.
The average price of such models is from 3,000 to 6,000 rubles. Men prefer to buy only jackets - they choose suits less often.
They can be purchased not only from online retailers.
Budget options are available at H&M, Mango, Next and Zara.
In the luxury segment, velvet jackets are represented in practically every brand - and Brioni, Paul Smith, Etro and Saint Laurent.
The most desired model is the one by Gucci, in which Jared Leto, the ambassador of the brand, appeared.
Choosing expensive-brand jackets means you can be sure that the velvet is made from silk.
Thanks to a special weaving technology, a dense fabric with a knobby outer texture and a smooth inner side is produced.
More budget-friendly options are made from cotton or polyamide, but, accordingly, last less.
Fashion expert Ilia Vakushkin warns that in the case of the velvet jacket, the main thing is not its model or style, but appropriateness.
"A velvet jacket requires evening light, so this jacket is ideal if you are going to a party or a formal event, explains Vakhoshkin. It will also work for those occasions when the invitation specifies a "Black Tie" or "Creative Black Tie" dress code.
Another important criterion, which allows you to choose a velvet jacket, is the status of its buyer.
“A man in a velvet jacket should first of all have a proper, well-groomed entourage, the authors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion “Krasavchik Brammell” believe. “The owners of velvet jackets, as a rule, belong to the caste of people who rarely buy tickets.
They are simply invited to themed parties, where the dress code is always specified.
Ilya Vakhoshkin suggests combining a velvet jacket with similar items: classic trousers with stripes, a one-color shirt, a silk tie, a pocket square, and cufflinks.
Too simple and mundane things will look out of place.
Fashion experts from "Krasavchik Bramblell" are certain: it would be inappropriate for a regular employee to appear in a velvet jacket at a corporate event, but if we are talking about "the director, who is in charge of this event, then - yes, such a thing is appropriate".
If you are a lower-ranking employee and your goal is to move up in the company's complex hierarchy or to get financial bonuses, then it is better not to wear a silk jacket.
The management will definitely assess this phrase as “not a peasant’s hat”, the editors of the Telegram channel about men’s fashion believe.
Very ambiguous feelings about the voice.
It's an unnatural sound, so strained.
And it has nothing to do with the cute face of the young girl.
To be honest, I don't understand the admiration of those around me.
But I wish you all the best in life!
It's all about the money - alternative energy is lobbied for, i.e. paid for.
Billions of dollars.
Are they crying?
No, electricity prices have risen.
Traditional energy is also not in the market - and gas, oil and coal are cheaper than they are now.
Wild demand for fuel.
A penny drops.
And who was on the flight?
As usual, a regular customer.
Are the problems of the Native Americans affecting the sheriff?
Therefore, it is not correct to consider Western politicians as idiots who have "missed" the energy crisis.
They did their job.
For a good laugh.
I didn't see one pretty person in the pictures in the article.
Just average for the average passenger.
Perhaps if such characters are so confident in their beauty that they decide to show it to the whole carriage, then they are unlikely to be able to resist them.
But only because of their mental disorder and ignorance, and not because of their appearance.
Kazbek, "a slave who is aware of his slavery and is fighting against it, is a revolutionary.
A slave who does not recognize his slavery and lives a silent, unconscious, and speechless life is simply a slave.
Rab, who has a runny nose, when he self-importantly describes the beauty of life as a slave and praises a kind and good master, is a servant, a scoundrel."
Immunologist says booster shot in 4-5 months will protect against 'omicron' strain of coronavirus
A booster shot four to five months later could protect against the new coronavirus strain "omicron".
Immunologist Nikolai Krouchkov said that the six-month period, taking into account the appearance of a new strain, is “a very long period”
"In the previous strains, such a period was normal, but now it is better to carry out the procedure five months later, and people with chronic diseases - four months later," the expert said, urging to carry out revaccination in parallel with the vaccination campaign.
Kruchkov also noted that early revaccination provides a good titer of neutralizing antibodies.
"If a person has received two vaccinations and a booster, or has recovered from the disease and been vaccinated, or has been vaccinated and recovered, then they have acquired "hybrid immunity", i.e. antibodies that are present in sufficient quantities to neutralise the virus," the expert explained.
The G7 warned Russia of 'significant consequences' in the event of an invasion of Ukraine
The "Big Seven" (the United Kingdom, Germany, Italy, Canada, the United States, France and Japan) issued a statement following the meeting of foreign ministers in Liverpool.
It emphasizes that "military aggression" by Russia against Ukraine "will have huge consequences and will be costly" for Moscow, but specific measures are not described in the document.
"We, the foreign ministers of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the United Kingdom and the United States of America, and the High Representative of the European Union, stand united in our condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine," the statement said.
The ministers then called on Russia to "de-escalate, use diplomatic channels and comply with its international obligations on transparency of military activities," as President Biden said during a video call with Russian President Putin on December 7.
"We confirm our support for France and Germany's efforts in the Normandy format to achieve full implementation of the Minsk agreements in order to resolve the conflict in eastern Ukraine," the foreign ministers of the "Big Seven" also said.
Any use of force to change borders is strictly prohibited under international law.
Russia should not doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have huge consequences and a serious price in response," they warn.
We reaffirm our unwavering commitment to the sovereignty and territorial integrity of Ukraine, as well as the right of any sovereign state to determine its own future.
We welcome the restrained position of Ukraine.
We will intensify our cooperation in our common and comprehensive response," the statement also said.
Earlier in the day, British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss said that Russia would face "serious consequences" in the event of an invasion of Ukraine.
According to her, this meeting showed the "unified voice of the G7 countries, which account for 50% of the world's GDP, and which very clearly stated that the invasion of Ukraine will have huge consequences for Russia."
Pfizer vaccine found 32 times less effective against omicron strain
The Pfizer-BioNTech vaccine against the omicron strain of the coronavirus is 32 times less effective than against other types of the disease.
The conclusion was reached by scientists from the University of Hong Kong and the Chinese University of Hong Kong, South China Morning Post (SCMP) reports.
The vaccine was found to be less effective based on a study of antiviral activity in people who received two doses of the COVID-19 vaccine.
"We see that most people have a high level of antiviral activity against the original Sars-CoV-2 strain, but this ability has been significantly reduced against the omicron variant," Professor Malik Peiris said.
At the same time, scientists stressed that vaccination remains the most reliable way of protection against the severe course of the disease in the event of a coronavirus infection.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted the development of a coronavirus pandemic taking into account the influence of the omicron strain.
The authors of the study concluded that the omicron strain could cause a new wave of circulation of the virus and a rise in mortality if additional measures are not taken.
Ukraine's defense chief accuses Germany of blocking NATO weapons deliveries to Kiev
The head of the Ukrainian Ministry of Defense, Alexey Reznikov, accused the government of former German Chancellor Angela Merkel of blocking the purchase of lethal weapons by Kiev within NATO.
In an interview with the Financial Times on December 12, Reznikov reminded that in the previous month, Germany vetoed the purchase of Ukrainian anti-sniper systems and rifles for the destruction of drones.
At the same time, it is noted that later Berlin softened its position on rifles, recognizing them as lethal weapons.
According to the defense minister, Kiev intends to acquire the aforementioned weapons within the framework of bilateral agreements with allies.
In particular, this refers to the United States, Great Britain, Lithuania and France.
Meanwhile, the FT notes that the position of the new German government under the leadership of Chancellor Olaf Scholz on the issue of supplying weapons to Ukraine remains unclear.
Earlier on Sunday, Ukraine's ambassador to Germany, Andriy Melnyk, expressed the opinion that Kiev should not expect weapons deliveries from Berlin while Chancellor Scholz is in office.
According to him, the previous German leadership explained its refusal to provide weapons by the risk of escalation of the conflict in Donbass, despite the "occupation of Russia" of part of the Ukrainian territory.
The diplomat is confident that Germany will maintain the same "unlogical" position even with a new chancellor.
In August, Ukrainian leader Volodymyr Zelensky said that Kiev was expecting help from Berlin in equipping its naval fleet.
In Ukraine, it is expected that Germany will be a "partner in the technical sense," the president added.
It was also noted that in the spring of this year, the co-chair of the German Green Party, Robert Habeck, visited the republic, where he spoke in favor of selling Kiev defensive weapons.
Sergey NOSOV 2, no, bad eyesight is no excuse.
"And" instead of "E"?
To omit commas in large numbers?
And write instead of write.
No, you are an illiterate person.
For a philologist, this is a disgrace.
Fishing game set: e/f light, sound, in the game field, 2 fishing rods, 5 figures, 3AA battery not included.
Electric fishing is fun and educational for children.
While playing, the baby will train small motor skills of the hands, develop dexterity, accuracy and attention.
It is worth turning on the toy, as five miniature fish will start to swim around the imitation pond to a cheerful melody.
The child's task is to catch them all!
It can be played alone or in pairs: the set includes 2 fishing rods.
The toy works from 3 AA batteries (not included).
The size of the playing field (LxWxH) is 21x17x4 cm.
The item is made of plastic.
Recommended age: 3 years +
The winners of the Arsenyev Prize have been named in Moscow - Russian Gazette
A solemn ceremony of awarding the winners of the third season of the All-Russian Literary Award “Far East” named after
V. K. Arsenieva passed in Moscow.
As reported on the award's Instagram page, a total of 89 applications were received by the organizing committee this season.
63 were selected.
The leaders in the number of submitted works were Primorsky and Khabarovsk Krais - 13 and 11 applications respectively.
More than 60 works were submitted for the award in three categories: "Long Fiction", "Short Fiction" and "Fiction for Children".
Nine works made the shortlist - three in each category.
Alexander Filkin (Primorsky Krai) won in the “Long Fiction” category with the book “Inscription on the Gospel”.
The award was presented to the winner by Deputy Prime Minister and Plenipotentiary Representative of the President of the Russian Federation in the Far East Yury Trutnev.
In the short story category, the best was awarded to Lyubov Bezbakh (Sakhalin region) for the work “The Whisper of the Night Rain”.
She received the award from the Russian Minister for the Development of the Far East and the Arctic, Alexey Chekunkov.
In the “Children’s prose” nomination, the winner was the Zabaykalsky Krai writer Nina Belomestnova and her “Golden Thread”.
The author was awarded by the screenwriter, writer, candidate of philological sciences and the chairman of the Jury Andrey Gelasymov.
All winners will receive 500,000 rubles.
We will recall that the “Far East” award is given to the authors of the best works on the Far Eastern theme.
The main task of the award is not only to award the winners and tell about the modern authors, but also to attract cultural interest to the Far East as a territory of priority development in the 21st century.
Novels, short stories, collections of short stories or stories, as well as documentary prose and memoirs are eligible for nomination.
The author’s place of residence is not important, the main thing is to write in Russian.
The official website of the prize: https://arseenyeva.rf/.
Skovoroda, d=22 cm, with handle, dark marble, 4278884.
The Kukmara "marble" cookware is made from cast aluminium and is coated with an innovative water-based marble finish enhanced with super-hard mineral particles.
The features of the “Marble” series of dishes.
The significant thickness of the walls and the bottom excludes deformation of the body, guarantees durability, and provides the necessary strength of the coating.
A highly durable anti-corrosive marble coating on a water base is reinforced with super-hard mineral particles.
Environmentally safe anti-stick coating without PFOA (perfluorooctanoic acid).
Ideal heat distribution across the entire surface of the pot, long-lasting heat retention.
The possibility of using the minimum amount of fat.
The anti-corrosive marble coating is applied by spraying, which guarantees the exclusive durability of the coating when in use.
Small scratches and minor roughness on the surface of the pan do not affect the properties of the non-stick coating and the longevity of the cookware.
The products will not go bad and will retain their taste.
The possibility of preparing tasty and healthy food without adding oil, as on hot stones.
The bottom is thickened up to 6 mm.
High thermal conductivity and ergonomics.
Easy to clean.
Suitable for all types of tiles, except induction.
It can be washed in a dishwasher.
The wall consists of 6 layers, the inner coating is "marble".
A highly scratch-resistant water-based coating reinforced with particles of super-hard minerals.
Enhanced ground layer.
A layer with a rough surface for better adhesion of the coating.
The body is made of cast aluminium, up to 6 mm thick.
The external anti-corrosive coating is “marble”.
The Kukmara pot will turn a regular cooking process into a pleasant and easy activity for any housewife.
Years... I did the same thing a long time ago.
He united the hall with the kitchen.
The apartment is three-room.
Was.
Of course, the project, the permit, the new technical passport, everything is in accordance with the law.
In the hallway, they made a bookcase and a large wardrobe.
A door was opened in the kitchen, and a lot of space was created.
Over the course of nearly 10 years living in this apartment, we have never regretted what we did.
A mistake - instead of a bath, a curved bathroom cabinet was installed.
I have regretted this a hundred times!
I only recently realized that I love rum.
But the wonderful world of rum I have not yet opened for myself, apart from Bacardi and Captain Morgan.
What else would you advise and what would be the best way to start this wonderful relationship?
I also got sick.
I won't get vaccinated.
He came to Chernomorets for “rehabilitation”.
Only the weather didn't go well...
The cottages are pretty, but normal birds will not settle in the bright cottages, ornithologists say.
Plus, the paint and other chemicals will deter the birds.
Only natural materials and natural colors.
Thank you, I will definitely try it.
And what does Japan have to do with it?
Thanks for the recipe.
What types of apples should be used in this recipe?
It's really good.
I add some more celery and a green apple.
Try it.
Recently, a zombie has declared that the automotive industry is experiencing an unprecedented shortage of semiconductors.
A table appeared on the screen showing which country produces what percentage of these semiconductors (presumably microcontrollers).
Russia was not on the list.
That's it!
In the United States, with their expensive workforce, it is profitable, but in Russia, it is not profitable!
And my mother-in-law was driving me crazy.
I'm sorry, she's not with us.
If I had seen her well, everything could have been different.
But apart from hatred, gossip, scandals, there is nothing to remember.
I feel sorry for her, she lived her life in anger.
Mercedes protests result of Abu Dhabi Grand Prix
The German Mercedes team, whose driver Lewis Hamilton finished second behind Red Bull's Max Verstappen in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, filed a protest against the final result of the race, the Formula 1 press service reports.
Mercedes believes that the rules of Formula 1 48.12 and 48.8 were violated during the race.
In the first case, the German team is disputing the decision of the stewards to return the circuit racers to one round with the leaders.
According to the second - Ferstappen overtook Hamilton before the "restart" zone was allowed.
It should be added that the result of the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix, according to which Ferrari's Kimi Raikkonen overtook Hamilton by 2.256 seconds and won the Formula 1 world championship, is preliminary until the Mercedes protests are considered
G7 warns Russia of responsibility for invasion of Ukraine
The G7 foreign ministers warned of "serious consequences" for Russia if it continued its military aggression against Ukraine, according to the final statement of the meeting.
The participants of the meeting also noted that they condemn the strengthening of Russian military forces on the country's borders.
"Russia should have no doubt that further military aggression against Ukraine will have serious consequences and serious costs," the statement said, published on the British government's website.
G7 ministers and the EU's chief diplomat said they were "united in their condemnation of Russia's military build-up and aggressive rhetoric towards Ukraine."
British Foreign Secretary Elizabeth Truss warned of "serious consequences" for Russia in the event of an invasion of Ukraine at a press conference in Liverpool.
We have made it clear that any incursion will have significant consequences...
The G7 wants Russia to abandon its aggression against Ukraine," she said (quoted by TASS).
Earlier, at the summit in Liverpool, G7 foreign ministers agreed that to resolve the crisis over the buildup of Russian troops on the border with Ukraine, both sides need to return to the negotiating table.
The talks were held in the "Normandy format".
The North Atlantic Alliance also took part in the dialogue on Ukraine in the “Normandy format”.
Russian Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said that by calling for Russia and Ukraine to return to the negotiating table, the G7 countries have "written themselves off as unable to take responsibility for their own mistakes."
Homsu Diamond waist bag.
The Diamond belt bag is perfect for sports, travel or just walking around.
It is convenient to take with you, it is roomy, made of durable and lightweight fabric.
The main department opens with the help of a lightning strike, which can be done with ease even while driving.
Stylish and bright design will suit those women who really have a good taste in accessories.
The bag has a universal size of 19x12x7 cm and a belt length of 40 to 60 cm, which means that it can accommodate various things, from a passport to a mobile phone.
The material makes it easy to remove the belt bag using various household items.
For convenience, you can use a special regulator for the strap size.
Ways to return stolen money through online stores have been revealed
There are several ways to get your money back from online stores that have been stolen, and not become a victim of fraud in the future.
Experts in information security revealed this to RBC.
To reduce the risk of large losses in the event of a data breach, it is recommended to keep the main funds on the card or bank account that are not used for online shopping.
Some of the savings can be put into a savings account and withdrawn as needed.
Experts also recommend setting up a separate card for online purchases.
If the money was stolen during a purchase at a store that doesn't use 3D Secure, you can initiate a refund process.
"In accordance with the rules established by payment systems, for unauthorized transactions conducted without the use of 3D Secure, responsibility is imposed on the participant in the payment chain who does not use the service," the representative of Promsvyazbank explained.
An expert from the international payment provider Ecommpay, Arthur Zaremba, noted that the buyer has the right to file a claim with the bank to dispute the fraudulent operation no later than 120 days after the purchase.
In addition, if the perpetrator used a card on online resources that did not require two-factor authentication, the transaction can be disputed and the money returned.
It is noted that in some cases, online stores themselves return the money to the client if the order has not yet been sent to delivery.
On November 19, a member of the Public Council, the director of the Safe Internet League, Ekaterina Mizulina, reported that in 2021 alone, 11,000 appeals were received on various cases of fraud: from the sale of fake documents to the theft of personal data.
She said that an effective solution in the current circumstances could be the creation of a single window for complaints against online fraudsters.
Scholz arrives in Poland to discuss Nord Stream 2 and EU legislation
The newly elected German Chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw for talks on the migrant crisis at the border with Belarus, the independence of the judiciary in Poland, the buildup of Russian troops along the border with Ukraine and the situation with the Russian Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline.
While Scholz has stated his desire to maintain good relations between Germany and Poland for a long time, the leaders of the two countries expressed clear expectations of each other.
Polish Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki said he would call on Scholz to oppose the Nord Stream 2 pipeline, which is intended to deliver Russian gas to Germany bypassing Ukraine.
According to Moravec, Russia can use the gas pipeline against Europe as a means of political pressure.
Germany, in turn, supported Poland's efforts to stop the flow of migrants trying to enter the country from Belarus.
Berlin said it would help Warsaw and Brussels resolve this crisis.
However, Poland's judicial system remains a source of contention.
The European Court of Justice has fined Poland, ruling that the judicial reforms carried out by the right-wing Law and Justice party violate EU law.
Poland refused to pay the fine and its top court ruled that national law takes precedence over EU rules.
The new German government, sworn in on Wednesday, despite demands from Poland and the United States, has not taken any public commitments to stop the Nord Stream 2 pipeline in the event of a Russian invasion of Ukraine.
U.S. officials told Congress members they had reached an understanding with Germany to halt the pipeline if Russia invaded Ukraine, a senior U.S. congressional aide said on Tuesday.
German officials have not confirmed the reports, but Scholz warned on Wednesday of the consequences if Russia invaded Ukraine, and the "Big Seven" confirmed the position on Sunday.
Dmitry, look more carefully.
The view from the window is the same, the size of the window has not changed.
They removed the wall between the kitchen and the room, so you can see part of the second window.
In fact, those who are not familiar with the initial planning are doubtful.
But I know such apartments very well and I can see how they have been redesigned.
Let everything go well with them.
It always surprises me when they write about the means to clean the sink, the toilet, the skirting boards, the taps.
They're washed once a year on Easter, you know, and you have to wash them yourself.
Just don't let it get to you.
Minzifry wants to give writers residencies
The future Foundation for the Support of Russian Writers will receive federal property left over from the Union of Writers of the USSR and the Literary Fund of the USSR.
Residencies for writers will be created on the basis of this, the “Parliamentary Gazette” reported in the Ministry of Culture, which will be the founder of the foundation.
The Ministry of Digital Development is preparing a draft presidential decree on the creation of the Russian Literature Support Fund.
The explanatory note clarifies that the fund will be tasked with caring for the buildings and structures that once belonged to the Soviet Union's Union of Writers and the Literature Fund.
“A significant number of real estate objects, previously belonging to the Literary Fund of the USSR, have been transferred to the ownership of the Russian Federation, including those located in the writers’ settlement of Peredelkino, the Komarovo settlement in the Leningrad region and other places”, the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications, and Mass Media’s press service told “Parliamentary Gazette”.
The project stipulates that the Foundation's charter should state that it is "established to promote literary activity by creating the necessary conditions for the creative work of writers."
"The creation of conditions for creative activity is understood to mean the creation of writer's residences in different regions of Russia based on the transferred property, in which there would be comfortable conditions for creativity," the Ministry of Digital Development, Communications, and Mass Media explained to us.
520 rubles for one cut tomato?
Sourdough bread is, in the literal sense, a layer of dough from a 550-ruble pack.
Three pieces of fish in a can for 570...
No, it looks, of course, tasty, but the price is simply outrageous.
It seems that all the oligarchs in Belarus gathered there.
Doctors warn of risks of long-term use of blood thinners after COVID-19 and before vaccination
Doctors Irina Yarceva and Sergey Tokarev warned of the danger of uncontrolled use of anticoagulants after contracting the coronavirus infection COVID-19 and before vaccination against the coronavirus.
A physician-therapist, immunologist Irina Yarceva said that independent prevention of the possible formation of clots after COVID-19 may provoke a stroke.
Yartseva explained that the anti-coagulants are not for everyone, only if the patient has been admitted to hospital, has been in hospital, and has complications.
A doctor prescribes anti-coagulants (blood-thinning drugs that prevent excessive clotting) as needed.
She said that now there is a plague - everyone is taking anticoagulants for a long time, and they are getting complications in the form of hemorrhagic strokes (bleeding in the brain).
The head of the UrO regional profilactologist, the scientific director of the Society of Prophylactic Medicine specialists, doctor of medical sciences Sergey Tokarev told URA.RU in a conversation that Russians are now often taking anti-coagulants without a prescription and before getting vaccinated against the coronavirus infection.
According to Dr Tokarev, citizens are trusting dubious advice on the Internet and are beginning to self-medicate.
There are such citizens who, a week before vaccination, start taking anti-coagulants on their own decision.
And during the preliminary examination prior to vaccination, doctors notice blood oozing.
He stressed that it is extremely dangerous to take any medication without determining the cause of any symptoms.
Potatoes are called a superfood to protect against hypertension
Studies have shown that regular consumption of this common and readily available vegetable can significantly reduce the risk of developing cardiovascular disease.
Potatoes are found in every kitchen and have amazing properties.
The product is rich in vitamins and microelements that contribute to the functioning of internal organs.
It helps with heart disease by improving circulation and lowering cholesterol, Semana reports.
Today, heart disease is the leading cause of early death.
To improve the situation, not only treatment is needed, but also proper nutrition.
One of the assistants in such a situation will be ordinary potatoes.
According to scientists, this root contains a lot of vitamins B1, B3, B6, and also a very important for the body vitamin C.
In addition, potatoes contain phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, and also riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
Microelements help to effectively work all internal systems of the body.
In addition to all this, the root vegetable fights natural age-related changes in the body, contains a lot of beneficial fiber for the digestive system.
When taken regularly, it may help prevent atherosclerosis and hypertension.
I had such a case.
The lady came to see the apartment.
I came from another city to show it.
The advert featured detailed photos and a description of the apartment.
She was very disappointed because there was no "fancy" kitchen and "fancy" balcony.
Tetke, apparently, has nothing to do, she just looks at other people's apartments, while people waste their time.
About 145,000 adolescents have received the first component of COVID-19 vaccine in Kazakhstan
Information on the vaccination of adolescents, pregnant and breastfeeding women against coronavirus has been published in Kazakhstan, Kazinform reports with reference to the Ministry of Healthcare for the Prevention of the Spread of COVID-19.
Twenty people died of coronavirus and pneumonia in Kazakhstan in one day. 85 people with coronavirus in critical condition - Rospotrebnadzor of Kazakhstan The majority of regions of Kazakhstan are in the "green zone" with regard to coronavirus
As of 11 December 2021, 181,037 people have received the first dose, and 14,580 people have received the second dose.
The first dose: adolescents - 144,613, pregnant women - 10,645, breastfeeding women - 25,779.
Second dose: adolescents - 10,690, pregnant women - 1,141, breastfeeding women - 2,749.
The plumber who found the money in the church wall will receive $20,000
The plumber who found the money in a church wall in the US state of Texas will be rewarded.
The information was released in a press release by Crime Stoppers of Houston.
The incident happened at a large evangelical church, Lakewood, where pastor Joel Osteen preaches a prosperity gospel that promises believers wealth and prosperity.
In November 2021, a plumber named Justin Cooley was renovating one of the church's toilets and discovered thousands of envelopes filled with cash and checks underneath the insulation.
He handed the find to the church and, according to him, did not even receive a thank you from Austin.
"I wanted to hear him say, "You know, Justin, you did the right thing.
We understand that you did and could have done," KPRC-TV quotes him as saying.
It appears the discovery is linked to a theft that happened at Lakewood Church seven years ago.
At the time, about $200,000 in cash and $400,000 in checks were missing from the church's safe.
The money was insured, so the church did not suffer any losses.
However, a reward of $25,000 was announced for information about the perpetrators.
Justin Coyle could not claim the sum as the award had already expired.
Despite that, the non-profit Crime Stoppers of Houston, which had offered a $5,000 reward and later received $20,000 in donations from Lakewood Church, decided to reward the plumber's honesty.
He will receive $20,000.
Earlier, police had interviewed pastor Joel Osteen about the money found in the church's wall.
Tanya, her words, her actions - that is her character as a real person.
Therefore, there is a negative attitude towards it.
And it's not that "it is financially much richer than all the other towns", as they write here.
There are people who are richer, but not everyone behaves so arrogantly, so provocatively as this madam.
The Promtex-Orient Soft Cocos 1 mattress, size 190x190.
The Soft Cocos 1 orthopedic spring mattress.
The basis is the TFK block (256 springs per square meter).
Independent springs help to distribute the load properly.
Coconut coir (material from the coir palm) is used as a filler.
Between the filler and the spring block, there are layers of felt.
Both sides of the mattress are firmer than average.
Jacquard Sense case: 5% cotton, 95% polyester.
The tissue density is 116 g/m².
Again, simply and deliciously.
She was looking for chicken recipes on your page.
We were given a chicken.
They grew it in their own garden, our friends.
It weighs more than four kilograms.
We would like to make it more appetizing.
I'm looking for a recipe for a chicken baked in beer.
Have you tried that?
I trust you more than just Internet recipes.
New human case of bird flu reported in China
A new case of human infection with highly pathogenic avian influenza H5N6 has been reported in China.
This was reported by the RTHK radio station with reference to a notice from the Hong Kong health authorities, ITAR-TASS reports.
The 68-year-old resident of Huai'an city in the southern province of Guangdong, who kept poultry in his home, was infected.
His condition is described as critical by doctors.
The first human infection with the H5N6 strain was recorded in May 2014 in the southwestern province of Sichuan.
Since then, the number of such cases in the country has reached 53.
In Brazil, citizens are required to present vaccination certificates when entering the country
Brazil has made it compulsory to demand COVID-19 passports from those entering the country, a decision made by Federal Supreme Court Justice Luis Roberto Barroso.
This is reported by CNN Brasil.
Citizens who have contraindications to vaccination are no longer required to present a vaccination certificate.
In addition, people arriving from countries where there is no evidence of the vaccine will also be excluded from the list.
"The situation is even more serious if we take into account that Brazil is a popular tourist destination for New Year's, pre-Carnival and Carnival parties, as well as other events, which means an increase in tourist traffic," Barroso noted.
Previously, Brazil's authorities had required unvaccinated coronavirus patients to observe a five-day quarantine.
The full protection scheme against COVID-19 has been revealed
A virologist, a doctor of medical sciences, and a distinguished scientist of Russia, Anatoly Altstein, in an interview with Ura.ru, revealed the scheme of complete protection from the coronavirus infection.
He says this can be achieved by introducing an injection and using a nasal vaccine.
When administered intranasally, large amounts of IgA are formed. This does not occur when the vaccine is injected.
Immunoglobulins A protect the mucous membrane, so the virus cannot enter the body.
And inside, after vaccination, the most antibodies G (antibodies) are formed.
And if you take both vaccines, you will get a lot of IgA and IgG antibodies. But there is no decision on double vaccination," the doctor explained.
The head of the Urals Federal District’s (Ural) profilactologist, Doctor of Medical Sciences, Sergey Tokarev, in turn, stated that the main advantage of nasal vaccination in combination with an injection is the possibility of no longer being a carrier of the COVID-19 virus.
He added that this would help because in that case the body's defences would presumably be at their maximum.
Earlier, the Minister of Health of Nizhny Novgorod Region David Melik-Guseynov stated that the new wave of the COVID-19 pandemic will lead to the spread of a new coronavirus infection among children.
According to him, such a picture is observed in other countries where the next wave of the pandemic has come earlier.
Inna, hmm...
I talked to my dog (who died a long time ago) like this - if you are ready to give up a warm home, a diet, a cuddle, love and games for a fluffy puppy, then go ahead.
But the pesel was trained and even smart.
I chose my society and went home.
The video shows how it works in 90% of cases.
It was not taken from the ceiling, believe me.
I slowed down many owners so that they didn't run after the dog, although they said, "Well, 200,000 run away (dachshunds), I just grabbed their hand and pulled them in the other direction."
In the end, "200 thousand" chose the owner, not the dog that ran away somewhere.
Mass protests against vaccinations continue in Europe
More than 40,000 demonstrators took to the streets in the Austrian capital, Vienna.
They expressed dissatisfaction with the restrictive measures and the government's plans to make vaccination against COVID-19 compulsory.
From February next year, people who are not vaccinated will have to pay a fine of 3,600 euros.
Spanish protesters took to the streets of Madrid in a peaceful march in response to the government's healthcare policies.
Some held placards with the message "This is a false pandemic", "I will not be vaccinated".
A major protest against the sanitary passports took place in Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia.
In the autonomous community, a COVID certificate is mandatory for access to bars, restaurants, sports halls, retirement homes and night-time entertainment venues.
The decision to introduce sanitary passports was taken in the wake of an increase in the number of coronavirus cases.
More than a thousand protesters in Luxembourg protested against the tightening of restrictions and QR codes.
The protest began peacefully, but then turned into clashes with the police.
A group of protesters started throwing stones at police.
In response, law enforcement officers used water cannons.
Nikolay S. even on Wikipedia there is no consensus on this matter.
Kashevarova-Rudneva is also listed as “the first Russian doctor, doctor of medicine”, probably because she started studying earlier.
Let's just not argue, I think they both deserve that title.
But only one agrees with Zakharova: Americans have only brought death and plunder to any country where they have appeared.
Lonax Cocos TFK 130x185 mattress.
A symmetric mattress made of natural coconut coir on a TFK spring block.
The mattress is firm, with layers of natural coconut on both sides.
The basis of the mattress is a block of independent springs TFK.
Independent springs help to evenly distribute the load, help the body to maintain its natural shape.
Coconut is hypoallergenic, hygienic, with excellent ventilation.
The natural Jacquard cover is dense, wear-resistant and pleasant to the touch.
It's bad and sad to grow old alone, but it's inevitable, unfortunately.
It's very sad to read about it.
A person should live as long as he can serve himself and not be a burden to anyone.
All the best.
WHO has found the "omicron" already in dozens of countries
The World Health Organization (WHO) said the new coronavirus strain, called "Omicron," has been detected in 63 countries.
Several experts have already said that the spread of the new strain could have catastrophic consequences.
The strain was reported in a statement from the World Health Organization.
As of December 9, the organization reported that the strain had been identified in 63 countries, in all six WHO regions.
This is despite the fact that it has only been actively spreading since late November.
The WHO also expressed concern about the rapid spread of the new variant of the coronavirus.
Experts at the World Health Organization (WHO) expressed concern that the new strain, based on preliminary data, could surpass the "delta" strain, also known as the Indian variant of the coronavirus, which is currently leading in all countries without exception.
Before that, World Health Organization (WHO) Director-General Tedros Adhanom Ghebreyesus said the Omicron strain can have a significant impact on the course of the coronavirus pandemic.
The same conclusions were reached in the UK as well.
Experts at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM) believe that "omicron" will overtake "delta" in the coming months.
But the number of cases in Britain alone is expected to be around 1 million, with official figures suggesting that only a few hundred people have fallen ill so far, with estimates of up to 10,000.
British experts predict tens of thousands of deaths from the Omicron strain, with more than 2,000 people a day being admitted to hospital at its peak.
The British health service will not be able to cope with this.
The situation is complicated by the fact that, according to the latest studies, the effectiveness of the vaccine of the Pfizer-BioNTech company against the "omicron" strain is 32 times lower than that against other types of disease.
How the Russian "Sputnik V" will react to the "omicron" is unknown - this will become clear in the next few weeks.
The Gamaleya Center has only just begun testing the Russian vaccine on the Omicron strain.
Why do we need to see the stages of ageing?
It would be better to see the execution of your exercises in more detail.
I don't understand the first exercise, how to do it: sitting on your heels or standing on your knees, as written, but how to press your hands on your hips?
Or hands on the hips?
Curious Belka, you are right, the Internet is different, it is easy and casual to communicate, but in a personal meeting and say nothing.
And to see a person, perhaps, is not what you expected, it did not catch you - from this comes the attitude.
When he meets his man, then the views will change.
And again Soviet time is called “the time of demons”.
Then people believed in God more than they do today.
And they were raised practically according to the laws of God (love of neighbor, do not steal, etc.).
What is the ideology today - money at any cost.
Glaubers like Glob are few and far between (there are none at all), but even if so, the devil's time has come in the 90s...
Our Petersburg, or rather, Leningrad communal apartment on Bolshaya Zelenaya continues to support communication to this day.
Of course, we are not the closest of friends, but we try to maintain a warm relationship with the older generation.
Perhaps this is due to the fact that there were no visitors in the apartment, the rooms were not rented, and the block brotherhood was not cancelled.
Unfortunately, we see more and more of them at funerals.
Lara Angelskaya, get out there!
Human babies, especially boys, are strong, mobile, energetic, playful, push, wrestle, fight, just like their little "cousins" in nature!
Only that they're not as soft as puppies or kittens, so bruises, bumps and scratches are common, and there's no such thing as a bumblebee!
And why?
Did Braithwaite overestimate his strength?
But you're always so sly, that you never accidentally hurt anyone, and you never hurt yourself either?
The SkySleep Wave Space BS mattress is 150x185 cm.
The Bonnell Wave Space BS (Wave Space BiEs) mattress has moderate firmness on both sides.
The comfortable layers of the mattress - a combination of coconut shell and artificial latex with a relief surface - ErgoFoam.
The cover is made of felt, it is made of jacquard fabric.
It is durable, resistant to wear and tear, yet it allows good ventilation of the mattress, without interfering with the ventilation of the mattress.
The cover is made of synthetic material, which makes it soft.
A practical mattress for the bedroom.
Koyra coconut has antimicrobial properties, it is hard and evenly distributes the weight that falls on it.
An artificial latex mattress with a honeycomb surface provides a micro-massage effect.
Durable materials, reliable construction.
The Bonnell spring block, in which the springs are connected to each other, is characterised by reliability, it can withstand large loads and is suitable for couples with a small weight difference.
The perimeter of the product is secured by a box made of PPU - it prolongs the service life of the mattress, protects the springs from deformation along the edges.
Israel's Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu announced the start of vaccinations in schools
Israel's Ministry of Health will begin an emergency campaign to increase vaccinations on Sunday.
Since December 12, the coronavirus vaccine has been administered in schools throughout Israel.
The Jewish state's prime minister, Naftali Bennett, said at today's cabinet meeting that the issue of vaccinating the fourth dose of citizens in the risk group will also be examined.
In Israel, mass vaccination of the population against the coronavirus infection COVID-19 began on December 20, 2020.
Israelis are being vaccinated with the Pfizer vaccine.
Since January 10 last year, vaccinated people have been receiving their second dose.
The vaccination of adolescents aged 12 to 15 in this country started in the beginning of June this year.
Currently, more than 5.78 million people have received both doses of the vaccine, and the third - more than 4.12 million citizens.
Anna Gauer, well, probably a spider won’t crawl into a trap, it’s also PAUCOOBRAZHE, as LYA put it.
In any case, I don't see ticks.
But I am curious, what if there is?
He needs to be given something else to tempt him
Dimax Genius 70x190 children's mattress
The children's double mattress made of natural latex and natural coconut coir on the basis of an independent spring block EVS500.
Latex and coconut children's mattress on an independent spring block.
Natural latex is a soft, elastic material that is environmentally friendly, hypoallergenic, and has excellent properties, making sleep as comfortable as possible.
The medium-firm side of the mattress is comfortable, made from natural coconut fibre and latex.
The mattress is based on a block of independent springs.
The springs are arranged in such a way as to distribute the load evenly across the mattress surface, supporting the body in a natural position.
A great option for school children and teenagers.
The cover is made of polycotton.
The material is strong, wear-resistant and not prone to abrasion.
Seven people died in Brazil as a result of floods
At least seven people were killed and 175 were injured in the powerful rains that hit the northeastern Brazilian state of Bahia and the neighbouring state of Minas Gerais.
This is reported by TASS with reference to the rescue services.
A tropical cyclone has been raging in the middle of these states since the middle of the week, and rainfall in the region has reached 450 mm. In 25 municipalities of the state of Bahia, an emergency situation has been declared, and in some of them, flooding has become the most destructive in 35 years.
Several bridges were destroyed, two hydroelectric dams were destroyed, and traffic was blocked on three routes.
According to rescuers, about 5,700 people were left without shelter, and another 6,700 were forced to leave their homes.
The damage from the natural disaster affected more than 85,000 residents of the region.
Nika Lerman, I know Levomekol ointment, I work with drugs.
It is good for inflammation.
Personally, I prefer Betadine for the regeneration of surface wounds and scars, but you can see for yourself that it is more effective.
The main thing is that the healing process is going, such a hole was, just a mess.
Hola, España, no me has escuchado y no me has entendido.
I will answer with the lines of M. Isakovsky: "Flying birds fly over\nIn search of the past summer.
They fly to hot countries,\nBut I don't want to fly,\nBut I'll stay with you,\nMy native side!
I don't need the sun of another country, I don't need a foreign land."
And believe me, the photos from the park where I skied, or my city, will not be any worse.
By the way, it would be much more interesting to see your wonderful house with its interiors.
MAPED (France) Color'peps Twist, 12 colours, twist-up, in plastic case.
A set of 12 bright wax crayons in a plastic case with a twist-up lead.
They don't break, they don't get dirty, and they're absolutely safe.
They don't require sharpening.
The body is made of high-quality, durable plastic.
Multi-use packaging: a package with a lightning bolt.
$13.5 billion went into apps - Hi-Tech
In 2021, app spending worldwide grew by 25% and downloads grew by 8%.
The most popular video services in the world turned out to be various video services.
The most popular video editor was CapCut, and they spent the most time on YouTube.
And the number of app downloads and user spending showed a significant increase from January to November 2021.
The number of downloads increased by 8%, reaching 140 billion. The users' spending in apps has increased by 25%, to a record $135 billion.
Such data was published by the analytical company App Annie, which published a report on the mobile app market in 2021.
In 2021, the global economy emerged from lockdown and began a post-pandemic recovery.
"Will such a "return to physical" growth of the economy slow down? Absolutely not," the authors of the report say.
India is the leader in terms of the number of applications downloaded: it accounts for about 20% of all downloads.
The United States (9%) and Brazil (8%) follow.
iOS users spent more than Android users: 65% of all app spending was on iOS.
CapCut, a video editor, took first place in terms of the number of downloads in 2021.
It is followed by two Indian apps - video-sharing app MX TakaTak and the online shopping app Meesho.
Telegram also ranks in the top 10 by the number of downloads.
In general, based on the number of downloads, VPN services are popular among users (two of which - VPN Master and NightOwl VPN - made it into the top 10), as are video creation and streaming services (in addition to CapCut and MX TakaTak, two other such services - Moj and SnackVideo - also made it into the top 10).
"The biggest spenders were on live streaming and online streaming apps," the report's authors noted.
YouTube is leading the pack, with TikTok, Disney+ and HBO Max also in the top five for user spending, along with Japanese manga subscription service Piccoma.
The first places by the number of monthly active users are occupied by Telegram, Instagram, Zoom and TikTok, and the mobile version of Microsoft Office closes the top 5.
In Russia, the leader in the number of downloads for the year was the shopping app AliExpress.
Behind it is the Zenly service, which shows the location of friends, and the same CapCut.
Also in the top 10 are the online karaoke app StarMaker, the online clothing retailer Shein, the Maps for Minecraft PE app, the online taxi ordering service DiDi, the YouTube Pure Tuber client, the Dixy retailer app and the online scooter store.
People all over the world have adapted to the pandemic by going mobile, which can be considered one of the main takeaways.
The areas that have seen the most success are those that help people connect both virtually and in person," App Annie's chief research officer, Lexi Sidow, commented on the report.
The mobile games sector generated $90 billion in 2021, with the leaders in terms of downloads being casual and hypercasual games, which have no or almost no plot, and the video design is minimal.
The top three most popular games in the world are Count Masters, Project Makeover and Bridge Race.
DOP 2: Delete One Part, Going Balls and Phone Case DIY are the most popular games in Russia.
Previously, App Annie presented its forecast for 2022.
Among the major trends for next year, analysts at the company named the growth of TikTok users to 1.5 billion, the growth in popularity of Generation Z financial apps, such as the investment app Robinhood, and further growth in the popularity of metaverse mobile games.
Clan De File dog treats for pork, 30 pieces, 40 g each.
All-natural dog treat made from beef.
Clan De File is a dog meat fillet made from beef, and nothing else.
Natural, air-dried dog treats for all breeds and ages.
Only one type of protein is used in the preparation - beef.
This reduces the risk of food allergies, so the treats are perfect for dogs with sensitive stomachs and prone to allergic reactions.
The main ingredient of the product is a meat fillet processed in accordance with human grade quality standards, which are used in the preparation of food for humans.
Recommended daily ration: no more than 10% of the animal's daily ration.
Energy value: 407 kcal.
Ingredients: beef fillet.
Nutritional value: protein 57%, fat 17%, ash 4%, moisture 20%.
Russians warned about new scam
The perpetrators began to look for new ways to commit fraud in video messages.
Izvestia writes about this with reference to experts.
According to Ivideon's Director of Products Zaur Abutaliyev, the main danger associated with the spread of video communication tools is diplopia.
In this case, fraudsters create fake videos based on real recordings with the victim's participation.
This allows the neural network to accurately reproduce the characteristics of a person's behaviour.
Abutaliyev added that using deepfake technology, criminals can call the victim's relatives on a video call or create a video with the participation of a copy of the person to send out to blackmail.
"Such hoaxes can easily provoke bullying, as a skilled perpetrator can put people in embarrassing, dangerous or compromising fake scenarios," the expert said.
Varonis lead systems engineer Alexander Vetkol also noted that psychologically people are more likely to trust others when they can see them.
He stressed that this could create specific risks in the event of video-based technologies.
David, I add.
In what I wrote above, I focused on the fact that all of this I bought in a small town, where the local mentality did not allow for much make-up and short skirts, showing socks and knickers on the feet.
It's a province, but there was a product in the store.
In big cities and in Muslim countries, women painted themselves and showed off their henna.
This is the same in Dushanbe, it is a big city, the capital of the republic.
There are many trends, but there is no same cosmetics.
Five actions to help avoid diabetes
High blood sugar levels are one of the most common problems in the world.
However, some do not attach much importance to this, and that is a mistake.
Diabetes can eventually lead to serious complications and even death.
Preventive measures play a major role in preventing the formation of diseases.
For example, doctors recommend changing the drinking regime - reducing the number of different drinks and switching to plain water positively affects metabolism.
Sugary foods raise blood sugar levels to dangerous levels when consumed in excess.
Therefore, the first step on the path to a healthy lifestyle is to stop buying sweets and store them at home.
The appearance of the disease is not only affected by improper nutrition, but also by habits.
To reduce the risk of diabetes, it is necessary to move a lot.
Experts recommend following a low-carb diet.
Such a diet will not only help to reduce weight, but will also protect against sharp fluctuations in sugar levels.
To protect against diabetes, it is necessary to eat a lot of fiber.
Dietary fibers fill the stomach and thus contribute to the feeling of satiety, the secretion of digestive juices and the absorption of food.
Tomato seeds GAVRISH Pink Bush F1 0.10 g, article number 4241014.
A dwarf early-maturing beefsteak tomato with abundant fruit for open-ground and temporary-cover production.
The plant is determinate, with short internodes.
The fruit is large, of a deep pink colour, quite dense, weighing 180-210g, protected from sunburn by the leaves, and keeps well.
The meat is juicy and sweet.
The hybrid is resistant to a complex of diseases.
It is recommended for salads, appetizers and slicing.
Planting in the nursery: at the end of March - beginning of April.
The plot is in the first phase of the first real sheet.
Planting out the seedlings in the greenhouses is in May.
After landing on open ground, the plants form and are tied down.
MK Slava FC-160.
This freezer has an A-class energy efficiency rating, which means that it consumes significantly less electricity during operation.
The freezer is suitable for both a private home and an apartment thanks to the use of high-quality quiet compressors and excellent sound insulation.
The camera is quieter than a regular fridge.
The quick freezing function freezes the products in the shortest possible time, preserving the maximum amount of useful substances.
The Slavda FC-160 freezer complies with the climatic class N/ST, which allows it to work without problems at temperatures up to +38 degrees in the room.
A digital control panel with automatic temperature control.
Doctor Pavlova spoke about the “weekend migraine” of workaholics
Several factors can contribute to a worsening of symptoms over the weekend
The reason for the worsening of the patient’s condition after a working day is often a “weekend migraine”, endocrinologist, candidate of medical sciences, senior research associate of the Faculty of Fundamental Medicine of the Moscow State University, head of the System Medicine Clinic of Zukhra Pavlova in her Telegram channel told.
She says that workaholics are particularly affected by this, with headaches, exhaustion and weakness common on the weekend.
Doctor Pavlova noted that in addition to the accumulated fatigue, there are many objective reasons for the negative reaction of the body to changes in conditions.
On weekends, our lives are completely changed.
"We sleep for a long time, all day we lie on the couch, we probably eat more and drink less, the doctor argued. "Because of the lack of coffee, a small break begins.
Because of overeating and lack of water - heavy and broken."
The late surge is also important.
For example, if you get up three hours later than usual, you will experience a reaction called jet lag.
It affects travellers who cross several time zones.
To determine which of the factors is playing a decisive role in the worsening of her health, Pavlova recommended tracking what changes the most on weekends.
Mattress Benartti Optimal Hard S1000 130x185.
The reinforced perimeter made of high-density foam significantly increases the service life of the mattress.
The "Optimal Hard S1000" mattress with different firmness levels, the total height of the mattress is 23 cm.
The maximum load per bed is 140 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per one sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in a separate tissue pocket, which allows the body's load to be evenly distributed.
An insulating layer of wool has been added to the spring block to separate the mattress fillings and springs.
On one side of the mattress, a layer of coconut coir of 2 cm thickness is placed, which provides additional firmness and durability to the mattress.
A sheepskin jacket lined with artificial leather 2 cm thick and Hollcon 1 cm material, which provides additional comfort.
On the other side, a layer of coconut coir 1 cm thick and a layer of wool was used.
The fabric was treated with a special antibacterial treatment Sanitized (Sweden).
The impregnation provides complete destruction of fungal spores, does not allow the development of microorganisms, dust mites and microbes.
The mattress is equipped with four easy-to-use handles for flipping, as well as air vents for additional ventilation.
South African scientists say Pfizer vaccine against omicron is low-efficacy
South Africa says Pfizer's Covid-19 vaccine against Omicron is ineffective
South African scientists have conducted a study and reported low efficacy of the Pfizer vaccine against the Omicron variant of the coronavirus.
According to estimates, it (the level of "omicron" neutralization) corresponds to (the level of) the vaccine's efficacy of 22.5% against symptomatic infections, due to which... the vaccine's ability to protect against infection is called into question, the text of the study published on the MedRxiv portal says.
At the same time, experts clarified that the drug can save from a severe course of the disease.
Earlier, the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted that the Omicron strain of the coronavirus could cause a new wave of the pandemic in Britain with more hospitalizations than last year.
How much hidden sugar is in everyday products?
Sugar is not a good source of nutrients.
Its excess in the diet can lead to type 2 diabetes, as well as cardiovascular and cancer diseases.
Consumers should be aware that a hidden sugar may be listed under an unfamiliar word in a product's name - an ingredient similar to sugar in terms of calories, composition and glycemic index.
On the label, there may be several dozen names, essentially meaning sugar.
Some of the most common and frequently encountered names are glucose and fructose.
Other refined sugars include dextrose (corn sugar), levulose (fruit sugar), molasses (black treacle), agave syrup and so on.
These are all simple sugars, which are either monosaccharides or disaccharides, and they can be found in confectionery, but also in ketchup, doctor's sausage, bread, etc.
Roskachestvo state that the most effective way to reduce sugar consumption is to eat whole and unprocessed foods, and to pay attention to the label and the many different names for sugar.
Different types of sugar have different tastes, but whatever the ingredient is called in the product - syrup or nectar, processed or unprocessed, brown or white - it is still sugar.
It is difficult to count the exact amount of sugar, as it is necessary to take into account not only the amount of sugar specified by the manufacturer on the packaging, but also the fact that vegetables, fruits, etc. contain a certain amount of sugar.
As a result, the total amount of sugar may be significantly higher than indicated on the label.
German Chancellor Scholz: Gas will lose importance for Germany in 25 years
The new German Chancellor Olaf Scholz said that the import of gas is losing importance for Germany as the country continues its transition to decarbonisation of the economy.
According to him, Germany plans to completely abandon gas, oil and coal by 2045, becoming a climate-neutral country.
"In 25 years, the question of transporting gas to Germany and Europe will play a different role," the chancellor said.
Scholz noted that Germany continues to be committed to ensuring that Ukraine continues to transport Russian natural gas in the future, as this resource is currently of great importance for the energy transition.
He recalled that Germany and the United States made a statement in which Berlin's support for the energy transformation of Ukraine was recorded.
Previously, German Foreign Minister Annalena Baerbock stated that the certification process for the Nord Stream 2 gas pipeline is ongoing.
According to the minister, during the coalition negotiations and the discussion of the coalition agreement, it was stated that European energy law should be applied to energy projects.
The diplomat also noted that the pipeline "does not meet EU requirements."
Thanks for the interesting photos!
In 1985, it was necessary to go to those places.
I remember the CMEZ, rising from the Kanatchikovo station, past the old building (resembling a substation, two-story building), along Kanatchikovsky Proezd, and turning right onto Vorovova Street to the factory gates...
Hackers break into Twitter account of Indian PM
Hackers have breached the Twitter account of Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
The perpetrators managed to publish a fake message.
It was reported that India allegedly recognized Bitcoin as a legal means of payment, and that the country had already purchased cryptocurrency.
Modi's office has asked people to ignore the new messages.
Premier's representatives said that Twitter reacted quickly - they restored access to the account.
The Indian page was hacked in 2020 and asked for donations to the fund using cryptocurrency.
A referendum in New Caledonia saw a majority vote against independence
A third referendum in New Caledonia, held on December 12, ended with the same result as the previous two.
According to the first partial results announced on Sunday, December 12, at noon, the majority of New Caledonia residents voted in the referendum against independence for their territory.
Turnout in this third vote was significantly lower than in the previous two.
According to preliminary results published by local authorities, 3.51% (2,755) voted in favor of New Caledonia's independence from France, while 96.49% (75,762) voted against it.
Turnout was 43.90%, with more than 80,000 people taking part in the election in New Caledonia.
As the French news agency France-Presse comments, "the outcome of these elections left no room for doubt", as supporters of independence urged voters not to vote.
As initiators of the referendum, they spoke out against it being held on December 12, saying that a new outbreak of COVID-19 on the archipelago would make it impossible to hold a full and "clean" election campaign.
Thus, this abstention opened the way to a third victory for the supporters of French New Caledonia, after the referendums held in November 2018 and October 2020.
In 2018, 56.7% of the population voted against independence, and in 2020, 53.3%.
The separatists said they do not recognize the results of the last vote and will challenge them in the UN.
As reported on Sunday, December 12, at the Elysee Palace, President of France Emmanuel Macron is scheduled to speak about the results of this referendum.
The issue of New Caledonia's independence has largely revived the French presidential campaign in recent weeks.
Several presidential candidates have spoken in favour of keeping the territory in France, saying it is "the last EU presence in the Pacific Ocean".
"New Caledonia must remain French," repeatedly reiterated Eric Zemmour.
The same statement was made by Republican candidate Valérie Pecresse, who published a column in Le Figaro at the end of October, urging the Caledonians to remain French.
For his part, Emmanuel Macron announced in May 2018 that he would not take a position, "because it is not his responsibility."
However, the President added: "France would be less beautiful without New Caledonia."
Prime Minister Jean Castex, for his part, expressed "a strong desire for the Caledonian choice to be a French choice".
Hey, what's up!
I've done you a little... a lot of harm, I'm still embarrassed, I'm ashamed.
Thank you for not turning away from my channel.
On the subject: I'm not an artist, I love to draw, but I get inspired to paint.
But as an artist - not as an artist: what can you change?
Just don't forget that the food was NATURAL, so obesity wasn't as common as it is now.
But medicine was at zero - leeches, garlic and decoctions.
Now, we would have been able to stand up.
And the food is completely irrelevant.
Turkey tested the world’s first drone with a laser weapon
In Turkey, the first in the world drone with a laser weapon successfully passed tests.
The UAV “Eren” was tested at distances of 100 to 500 meters, reports “MIR24”.
The device is capable of neutralizing explosive objects at a distance using a laser.
The new model’s maximum flight altitude is 3,000 meters.
After passing the relevant tests, the UAV will be put into service with the Turkish military, which will use it to destroy explosive devices without the need for sappers.
The agency stressed that Turkey is one of six countries in the world capable of developing and producing its own drones.
I cut the steaks with a knife.
Salt, sugar, black pepper and mustard seeds.
Sometimes, she added, it didn't hurt to add cloves.
In a deep cup, he covered the dish with a lid.
Well, that's how it is.
And why do I need this salmon for such money, I don't know what kind of fish it is, but the sturgeon is an excellent fish for such money.
Bread, butter, and cottage cheese.
A buttered sandwich.
WSJ readers criticize Russia-US relations article
Readers of The Wall Street Journal have criticised an article by Professor Christopher Hartwell in which he described his vision of relations between Russia and the United States.
The author expressed concern that the West allegedly sacrifices Ukraine to Russia.
In his article, he convinces readers of the danger that comes from Moscow and made a number of derogatory remarks about Russian President Vladimir Putin.
At the end of his speech, Hartwell called on the West to "stand together as one front against Russia."
WSJ readers expressed their disagreement with the professor's position.
“There is a lot of false information in this article”, one of the readers quotes RIA Novosti.
"Europe is not ours to lose, and Ukraine is not our land.
The United States and NATO allies will never go to war with Russia over Ukraine," another said.
Patches can also be applied to the lips.
The Dearboo Peach & Hibiscus Brightening Hydrogel Eye Patch is a high-tech hydrogel that provides high absorbency and delivers concentrated natural plant essences to the skin, adhering closely to the skin and giving a feeling of freshness.
When applied to the skin, the hydrogel minimises the accompanying loss of moisture and allows the essence to penetrate deep into the skin.
SONEX 2085/EL luminaire with PDU Nores
The 2085/EL NORES series lamp consists of a metal base (base) and a plastic diffuser.
The diffuser material is high-quality white matte acrylic, which ensures the light source is evenly diffused and has good light transmission.
The ceiling shape is square, in the form of a relief ornament with a geometric pattern, decorated with transparent points that give the built-in light fixture a beautiful effect of "star twinkle" and refraction.
The IP43 rating allows the light to be used in certain areas of wet rooms.
The kit includes a replaceable LED module with lenses, with a power of 72 W, which corresponds to a 520 W incandescent lamp.
And the DUS panel, which allows for a gradual change in the color temperature from 3000 to 6000K, a change in brightness, a transition to the warm/white/cold/night light mode.
Urjazh Maska for the face is a moisturizing thermal night mask of 50 ml.
Ultra-hydrating night mask for all skin types with a fresh, rested and glowing complexion in the morning!
The real "thermal bath" for dehydrated skin!
It moisturizes, smooths the skin's texture and restores the skin's barrier.
A very pleasant water-gel texture with no stickiness.
A great way to care for your skin after active sun exposure!
Hypoallergenic.
An earthquake of magnitude 5.2 occurred in the area of the Kuril Islands
A 5.2 magnitude earthquake struck near the Kuril Island of Shikotan.
It is noted that the epicenter of the earthquake was located 231.8 km northeast of the city of Severo-Kurilsk.
The focus was at a depth of 92.5 km.
Earlier, seismologists recorded an earthquake of magnitude 7.5 in Peru, in which ten people were injured.
If he had been born into a poor American family and tried to make his way in the world, it is unknown where his petty-bourgeois thinking would have gone.
It's good when you come to America as a famous person.
And if you are born there, you don't know why you are fighting.
So it was a waste of time that he was smearing mud, filth and poison on the construction site, which no one has yet invented a better one.
Ukraine will start producing new-generation air-to-air missiles
A new Ukrainian-Turkish plant will start creating the ANKA type of reactive unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs).
On December 11, an independent adviser to the head of the Ukrainian president’s office, Aleksey Arestovich, reported this.
In other words, they are able to act against air targets, against other drones.
Even against piloted aviation.
They will be equipped with Ukrainian engines and the rest of the Turkish avionics: the body and so on," Dialog.ua quotes him.
Commenting on the main features of the ANKA system, Arestovich said that it is about the jet-propelled UAVs, not the piston-engined ones.
According to him, this new generation of drones after Bayraktar surpasses it "in all respects."
The first batch of UAVs should be produced by the plant at the end of the next year, Arestovich concluded.
The ANKA drone was developed by the Turkish Aerospace Institute in February 2014.
The development of the drone was carried out by the Turkish authorities in collaboration with a number of private companies since 2010.
The Ukrainian General Staff previously classified data on the use of Bayraktar drones and Javelin missile systems during military operations by the combined forces in Donbass.
On December 6, President of Ukraine Vladimir Zelensky announced that the construction of a factory for the production of modern military unmanned aerial vehicles had begun in the country.
According to him, Ukraine is planning to use drones.
On September 29, Bayraktar Savunma and the Ukrainian Defense Ministry signed an agreement to build a center in Kiev region, where personnel training, as well as tests and maintenance of Turkish Bayraktar UAVs will be conducted.
The press service of the Ukrainian leader's office called the memorandum a "big real step forward."
Two lions escaped from a container at the airport
Lions have escaped from a Singapore airport.
This was reported by The Straits Times.
The two predators managed to escape from the container with seven lions, which had arrived on one of the planes.
The publication notes that it is unknown from which country they were brought to Singapore, and where they were headed.
One of the escaped lions climbed onto the roof of a container.
They couldn't get away from it because of the protective netting that was in place.
The standoff ended after the arrival of staff from the Mandai Wildlife Group, which manages all the Singapore zoos.
They have immobilized the lions with tranquilizers and plan to transport them to a quarantine facility.
Earlier, it was reported that a lion had escaped from its owner and was roaming the streets of Phnom Penh, the capital of Cambodia.
The animal voluntarily returned home on the same day, and no one was injured.
Experts warn of cancer risk from B9 vitamin
Research suggests that an excess of vitamin B9, also known as folic acid, may increase the risk of cancer.
The Daily Express has reported this.
According to experts, there are strong indications that people who do not have a folic acid deficiency are less likely to develop certain types of cancer, in particular colorectal cancer.
However, exceeding the necessary dose actually promotes the growth of cancer cells.
University of Alabama Birmingham professor of nutrition Beth Kitchin advises keeping track of the amount of folic acid consumed throughout the day.
The optimal dose is 400 micrograms per day.
Cancer risk increases only if the figure is significantly increased or decreased.
Kitschin recommends not taking vitamin B9 in tablets without a doctor's recommendation, to monitor the dosage and avoid milk and other food products that contain folic acid.
Previously, nutrition consultant Rachel Fine called folate a substance that slows aging.
Since it is also found in avocados, Fine recommended that men over 50 eat more of the fruit.
In the UK, up to 75,000 people could die from the Omicron strain by April
British scientists predict that up to 75,000 people could die in England over the next five months if restrictions are not tightened in the winter.
The Guardian reported this citing a study by experts from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine (LSHTM), TASS reports.
According to the most optimistic forecast of experts who are part of the Emergency Situation Advisory Group at the British Ministry of the Cabinet, by April 2022, the country will record at least 25,000 deaths from the Omicron strain, and around 175,000 patients will be hospitalized in total.
At the peak of the outbreak, hospitals will be treating more than 2,000 infected people every day.
"Serious measures to combat the coronavirus may be required to avoid the NHS being overwhelmed if the Omicron variant turns out to be more infectious than the Delta variant, and existing vaccines are not able to prevent infection," said mathematician Rosalind Barndorff-Nielsen from the LSHTM.
Previously, the UK Health Security Agency warned that if the spread of the Omicron strain continued at its current rate, there would be around 1 million cases of infection by the end of the year.
By mid-December, the Omicron strain could become dominant in the UK.
There are currently 1,898 cases of the Omicron strain of coronavirus in the UK, with 633 of those identified in the last 24 hours.
At the same time, on December 9, the head of the British Ministry of Health, Sajid Javid, stated that in reality, this figure could already reach 10,000 cases.
I wanted to write a smart comment, but I got to this point:
"The meat obtained as a result of the incredible suffering of the unfortunate animal and its employment in a second job."
And the table collapsed!
So the "unfortunate animal" is a man, and I thought a chimpanzee!
The last knight on this planet.
Richard Kraj, judging by the dislikes, is expressing his thoughts in a way that is not very accessible to most.
What were you trying to say - that those who are on Instagram are pretending or they are all doing well, because it is pointless to pretend?
The surplus is like a warehouse, everything that didn't sell in the past is here.
If you set out to dig and dig hard, you can find something worth keeping among the rubbish.
All you need to do is be patient and clearly understand what you are looking for.
Superyacht numbers have grown by a quarter in the world
The construction of superyachts this year and orders for next year are hitting all-time highs despite calls to cut carbon emissions and combat climate change.
The world fleet of yachts has 1200 units, which is 25% more than last year.
In the era of fighting climate change, it is hard to imagine that the number of people who want and have the money to buy a floating fortress for £50 million and above will not dwindle, writes The Guardian.
However, they are becoming more and more common.
This year, 25% more ships have been ordered than in the previous year.
Brokers say there hasn't been such a frenzy in the market in 20 years.
The first reason is that many who can afford a yacht are afraid of contracting the disease on land and prefer to stay away from the pandemic on their own vessel.
The second reason is also related to the coronavirus.
Previously, all these people would go to the office and meet with business partners in person, but now, the vast majority of them work remotely, and negotiations are conducted on the phone.
Broker Will Christie told the paper that shipyards are taking orders for new yachts into 2025 and beyond.
It means that customers are willing to pay more to get their yacht ready sooner, even if it's just by a year or two.
"People just want freedom, and the super-rich could afford it," he says.
In western society, many people criticise such behaviour and call it decadent.
The rich, sociologists say, don't want to understand that in times of scarcity, traveling in space, living on yachts or flying in their own planes is seen as provocative by society, since the elite doesn't want to share the responsibility for climate change with the rest of humanity.
Economists are calling for action and are proposing new taxes and rules for the super-rich, though they know it would be extremely difficult to implement given the mobility of money.
On the other hand, only the number of super-yachts ordered is impressive, but also their characteristics.
Of the 1200 ships, 27 have a length of more than 100 metres.
Norwegian billionaire Rekke is building the 183-metre REV Ocean superyacht.
After launch, it will be the largest yacht in the world.
The yacht has a "lunar pool" and a submarine designed for exploring the ocean floor.
On existing superyachts, helipads, open-air cinemas and boxing rings have become commonplace, and Professor Richard Wilkinson, an economic anthropologist at Indiana University, says compared to the total amount of carbon emissions, the carbon footprint of the super-rich is negligible.
But it has symbolic value, given that there are just over 2000 billionaires in the world.
This is just another example of the over-consumption of a very small group of people.
Scientists found that the emissions of the world's billionaires are thousands of times greater than the average person on the planet.
If one person produces an average of 5 tonnes of CO2 per year, then Roman Abramovich, the planet's biggest polluter, is responsible for 33.9 tonnes of greenhouse gases released into the atmosphere in 2018.
Two-thirds of the emissions allowance went on his 162.5-metre yacht, Eclipse.
Even if the owner is not on board the yacht, the crew continues to pollute the planet.
The owner can call the captain and give the order to tow the yacht, for example, from the Mediterranean to the Caribbean.
The superyacht owners are not sympathetic to others when they, like Australia's richest woman Gina Rinehart, who owns mines on the continent, complain via YouTube that there is no berth for their giant ships.
It is also hard to understand her call to build marinas for ships of 50 metres.
Dangerous weekly alcohol limit linked to bowel cancer
American scientists have determined how much alcohol in a week increases the risk of cancer.
This is reported by the Daily Express newspaper.
Experts concluded that the consumption of four or more alcoholic drinks per week is associated with an increased risk of cancer.
At the same time, the likelihood of developing the disease increases with the amount of alcohol consumed.
Moreover, moderate drinkers have a higher risk of colorectal cancer than women.
The exact cause of the development of such a type of oncology cannot be determined, the scientists note, only noting that certain factors lead to a harmful process for the organism.
Thanks to the author for the worthy material and photo.
Sergei, I don't see anything wrong with egoism and pride.
Just like you can't see narcissism and hubris in a man who seeks a free surrogate mother to burden her with expenses and responsibility, while enjoying the title of father from a safe distance.
Why they work in the ministry, they have a place in the circus.
I understand that everything should have been done in a royal manner, but the model is very hypertrophied.
It is hard to imagine how poor Diana was crammed into the carriage, and indeed any movement.
I was 12 years old and I remember watching it on TV.
It seemed like almost every little girl dreamed of being a princess in a pretty, frilly dress, and I was no exception.
But looking at this dress, I changed my mind about being a princess.
Dogs can understand words and phrases at the level of a two-year-old child
Many, or rather all dog lovers are convinced that these creatures are very smart.
But even they don't realize how developed the four-legged pets really are.
For many years, biologists have been conducting various experiments to find out exactly how intelligent animals are.
While a dog's vocabulary is not as extensive as a human's, a new study has shown that dogs can respond to 89 words or phrases in sequence.
The research was published in the journal Sciencealert.
Dogs can't play chess or write poetry, they don't understand politics, economics or art, but they often manage to deceive their owners.
Representatives of some breeds, according to experts, show the best results in understanding human language, but there is not enough statistical data to draw firm conclusions.
For example, some breeds are traditionally considered canine geniuses - for example, labradors.
The scientists concluded that dogs are capable of logical thinking and are as trainable as a two-year-old child.
Dreamline Dream Massage TFK 80x200 mattress.
The independent spring block TFK mattress with natural latex and coconut coir.
This mattress is made on the basis of an independent TFK block.
This is a reliable modern construction with 512 independent springs for the bed.
Each spring is in its own pouch and does not affect the neighbouring ones.
In this way, the load on the mattress is distributed as evenly as possible.
The person takes on a natural form while sleeping.
The springs are insulated from the upper layers of the thermal insulation with a thermal barrier.
The top layer is made of natural latex and coconut, which have excellent and wonderful properties.
One side is covered with a thin layer of natural seven-zone latex.
This natural filler has 7 comfort zones, helps to perceive the weight of a person, has a light massage effect.
The Antistress cover is made from velveteen, which is 250 g/m2 of canvas.
It is pleasant to the touch and externally, it has calming, relaxing properties.
Sova, a shining example, is deep-sea angler Taumaica Aksel.
Some of his victims are so great that they become the cause of the barber's death.
He simply can't swallow them, and his teeth don't allow him to spit out too much of the catch back into the water.
If you don't care about the fate of your four properties, why did you decide that your properties are of interest to someone and they will be taken care of?
Today, the law allows you to manage your property.
Do it yourself if you don't like how others do it.
Ukraine is ready to trade with the US and Russia
The US and Russia will "trade" over Ukraine's accession to NATO, stated an analyst Alexander Kochetkov in his article for the publication "Glavred".
According to him, Washington and Moscow are planning to continue negotiations on the guarantees of the United States that Ukraine will not join the North Atlantic Alliance, despite the words of the American leader Joe Biden about the right of countries "to go wherever they want".
If you are offered something manifestly unacceptable, for example, to sell a close relative into sexual slavery, you will not haggle, but simply report the proposer.
And as for Ukraine, a trade is planned," the analyst wrote.
Kochetkov added that Russia has no plans to attack Ukraine and is seeking dialogue with Kiev.
"They prepare secretly, quickly and immediately switch to offensive actions, not waiting for the group to be detected and to deploy countermeasures," he noted.
China promotes the development of the railway transportation industry
Advanced Chinese technologies attracted the attention of companies from the United States, Germany, France and other countries at the 2021 China International Rail Transportation and Equipment Manufacturing Exhibition held in Chuzhou City, Hunan Province, Central China.
The main technologies developed by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co. Ltd. allow trains to automatically detect and diagnose technical faults, said Hou Zhaowen of the company.
High-speed trains running on the China-Laos Railway, which was put into operation at the beginning of this month, are already equipped with these technologies, which will ensure increased reliability and operability of the rolling stock.
In the past six months, China has significantly increased its exports of railway vehicles, and many countries in Asia and Europe have become witnesses of "Chinese speed".
In May this year, the first two-story high-speed electric trains designed in China by CRRC Zhuzhou Locomotive Co., Ltd. came off the production line. They are intended for export to Europe.
With a maximum speed of 200 kilometres per hour, these trains will run on the Austrian, German, Hungarian and other European railways.
In November, the trial operation of the metro train designed by the aforementioned company for Turkey began.
The train will run along a metro line connecting the centre of Istanbul with the city's airport.
The metro line in this direction will open next year.
It will be the fastest metro line in Turkey with a speed of 120 kilometres per hour.
"China's railway equipment manufacturing industry is one of the industries with the highest level of innovation and the strongest international innovation competitiveness," said Fan Yajian, head of the Trade and Investment Department of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade (CCPIT).
"This sector is China's main competitive advantage in the global market for high-end equipment," said Fan Yajian.
After more than 60 years of hard work, China has created a leading production system for railway equipment, with a complete set of supporting facilities and large-scale production.
According to Fan Yaojian, the country ranks first in the level of electrification of railways and in the operating mileage of high-speed and urban railways.
Biologist lists early signs of dementia
Candidate of Biological Sciences Semen Goloshekin in conversation with the radio station Sputnik listed the early signs of dementia.
According to him, the signs of future dementia may include forgetfulness, as well as a whole range of mild cognitive impairments, such as the inability to concentrate, plan, and reduce the level of abstract thinking.
Currently, there is debate about whether hearing loss can be an early sign of Alzheimer's disease or a risk factor for its development, a specialist said.
Goloshekin stressed that the causes of dementia may be neurodegenerative disorders, head injuries, some infections, metabolic disorders, and a lack of certain vitamins.
He added that Alzheimer's disease and cerebrovascular atherosclerosis are the most common causes of this syndrome.
The biologist noted that to date, doctors do not know effective ways of treating dementia.
Therefore, it is necessary to start its prevention in time.
According to him, learning foreign languages and active communication will help reduce the risk of dementia.
WHO also recommends maintaining moderate physical activity, regularly training cognitive skills through games and hobbies that require intense memory and logical thinking
“There are recommendations for the use of various BAs, but their effectiveness and expediency are still being discussed in the scientific community”, said Goloshchekin.
The World Health Organization recommends maintaining moderate physical activity, regular cognitive skills and abilities training through games and hobbies that require intense memory and logical thinking, Goloshchekin said.
Earlier, a British charity for dementia research said the disease was increasingly affecting people in their 40s.
The doctors said the early symptoms of Alzheimer's disease.
The first warning sign can be vision problems, which cause the patient to have trouble recognizing objects.
Another sign of developing dementia, experts said, is aphasia - a condition in which a person is unable to find the right words to express what they want to say.
A neurologist demanded that Saakashvili be sent abroad for treatment
Former President of Georgia Mikhail Saakashvili needs psychotherapy and rehabilitation abroad, said neurologist Otar Toidze, who is part of the medical advisory board set up by Georgia's ombudsman.
His neurological status is the leading cause of his illness.
The stable problems are movement, coordination, and character variability," the specialist said, noting that this does not go beyond the norm and now the former president needs to be sent to a special rehabilitation facility.
"We call this neurorehabilitation and psychoneurorehabilitation, which we did not find in Georgia," Toidezi said, demanding that Saakashvili be treated in a special facility, which Georgia does not have.
On the evening of December 7, Saakashvili began to sabotage the provision of medical care after the penitentiary service staff subjected him to disciplinary punishment.
The Georgian politician was quickly able to overturn the punishment and regain his previous rights.
Aleksandra, "Are you also taking money for this?" - I'm interested to know where such people come from...
For bread in a bakery, it's normal to pay, but for a tutor's work, it's not?
Or are we so holy that we feed on air?
There is another side to the medal.
These people are parasites on society.
They don’t work, they don’t pay taxes, they live on benefits and at the expense of relatives.
In addition, they receive full medical care.
How many bites can a working person eat?
We feed all the alcoholics, drug addicts who have also lost their health because of their stupidity.
Then we are surprised by the extension of the pension age.
The money could have been spent on treating real sick people.
Of course, the red flag of Victory will forever remain in the history of our country and it should not be mixed up with the state flag.
The red flag has a reverse side, it is a symbol of the communist movement, so it will never be a state flag.
The author should stop writing provocative articles, he should already be red in the face and start living a normal life, not the past.
Protests against COVID passports took place in Spain
Protests against mandatory COVID-19 vaccination certificates took place in Spanish cities of Barcelona and Valencia, Europa Press reports.
In the Catalan capital, the number of participants in the rally was approximately 3,000.
In Barcelona, COVID passports have become mandatory for going to bars, restaurants, gyms, retirement homes and night clubs.
Many of the protesters came to the rally without masks.
On their posters, they accused the state of totalitarianism and called on citizens to respect their choice.
In Valencia, passports will also be required for entry into entertainment venues and restaurants with a capacity of more than 50 people.
Protesters in the city have said there is a medical dictatorship, and the vaccinations have been called an experiment.
More than 5.2 million cases of coronavirus infection have been identified in Spain since the start of the pandemic, more than 88,000 patients have died.
In Russia, it is also planned to introduce restrictions for the unvaccinated.
Draft laws on a unified QR code system were submitted to the State Duma on November 12.
It is assumed that Russians will be able to visit places where mass events, cultural institutions, public catering and retail outlets are held, provided that they present either a vaccination certificate or a medical certificate for vaccination.
The same rules will be established for trips on trains and planes.
Tatra Tradition Anthracite 26 cm cast iron with glass lid.
The cast iron stove with an anti-corrosive coating Antracit TM Tradition.
The pot is designed for daily use in the home.
Its exceptional strength and durability, equal to that of natural stone, has been specially developed for intensive use every day.
Thick-walled cast body.
A five-layer anti-corrosive coating system of the latest generation.
Premium coverage, enhanced with mineral particles.
Two layers of extra protection against the suburbs.
It has good non-stick properties for easy and pleasant preparation of healthy dishes without oil and fat.
At least 4000 cycles of preparation, in compliance with the rules of operation.
Suitable for all types of tiles, except induction.
GOST R 51162-2019.
The guarantee for each item is 4 years (provided that the rules of operation are followed - 4 years for the body and 1 year for the anti-corrosion coating).
They do not contain PFOA, LEAD, and CADMIUM.
Cast iron and grills can be used in the oven without a glass lid.
Easy to clean.
By logic, the virus is constantly changing.
If a person is healthy and rarely gets sick (once or twice a year with a common cold), then their immunity is normal.
Immunomodulators are not recommended for prevention at all by any doctor.
Immunity is supported by a healthy diet and lifestyle plus exercise.
In this case, vaccination against the flu and this coronavirus is pointless.
The 3M 5925 anti-aerosol filter.
FFP2 level of protection, 2 pieces.
Article No. 713946.
A replacement filter for the 3M 6000, 3M 7500 and full-face masks 3M.
It protects the user's respiratory tract from various substances in the air.
Creates a reliable barrier against infectious particles.
This filter is designed for operation in conditions where the concentration of harmful substances in the ambient air exceeds the permissible value.
The filter can be used to protect against bacteria/viruses together with, for example, essential oils and other antibacterial agents.
FFP2 class protection has a TLV greater than 0.05 mg/m3, with a maximum contaminant concentration of 12 times the TLV.
This class of respirators can hold at least 94% of harmful substances.
The pre-filters are attached to the gas masks using the 3M 501 holder.
Features: low resistance to breathing.
It is not difficult to review.
Compatible with 3M 6000 and 3M 7500 half-face masks and full-face masks 3M.
Compatibility with other PPE required in difficult working conditions is ensured.
The eyes of the "constitutional monarch" were not only mine. Judging by the network, they got not only me.
And this family PR - children, father...
Reva seemed to me to be some kind of nothing.
Only knew that Zaitsev was annoying - Zaitsev, Zaitsev.
Well, I learned, said once, and kept silent, let the other show himself, that's why they fought.
A steep climb: how Chinese become skiers
The Olympics will attract millions of people to the slopes and help create world-class resorts in the country
In China, it is hoped that the Olympics will not only attract 300 million citizens to take up winter sports, which will help President Xi Jinping collect 1 trillion yuan, but also help the economic development of the underdeveloped and remote provinces.
The ski resort of Taivu in Zhangjiakou, located not far from the site of the Winter Olympics, is becoming increasingly popular with Chinese people.
In addition to building infrastructure in the region, work is also underway to plant trees: workers plant trees.
There are more than 700 ski resorts in the country, but only 20 of them are large enough to host international competitions.
In many regions of China, where the resorts are located, including Zhangjiakou, there are problems with snow.
The main task in the long term is to provide comfortable and interesting holidays in Chinese resorts so that all newcomers become regular visitors.
However, this is still a long way off.
Games operations adviser Justin Downs says the Chinese ski industry has changed beyond recognition since his last visit in 2007.
More and more Chinese people are heading to the slopes every winter.
Fiona, a Beijing snowboarder, is one of them.
Despite the serious changes, it will take many years to create a skiing culture here, says Downs.
Many resorts are located in agricultural and mining areas.
These regions need to be actively developed and the necessary infrastructure for rest and recreation needs to be created there.
70-year-old Gao Makong lives in Chunli, not far from the site of the Winter Olympics.
He notes that in recent years there has been a boom in winter sports tourism here.
Two years ago, a high-speed railway was built from Beijing to Chongli, and now no one in the local area is unemployed.
More and more shops are opening in the country that sell clothing and equipment for winter sports.
On the slopes, they will open restaurants with national cuisine dishes.
There is even a COVID-19 testing station in Taipei now.
China is aiming to create a thriving winter sports industry, with its athletes becoming leaders at major international competitions, and its resorts and equipment reaching world-class levels.
More than 500 million people worldwide could be plunged into extreme poverty due to the pandemic, the World Health Organization has said.
More than 500 million people worldwide could be plunged into extreme poverty because of the coronavirus pandemic, which has stalled progress towards universal health coverage, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank (WB) said.
In observance of World Health Day on December 12, the World Health Organization (WHO) and the World Bank (WB) published two complementary reports.
They noted that the pandemic has led to disruptions in primary care, excessive strain on health care systems.
As a result, for the first time in 10 years, the population's immunization coverage decreased, tuberculosis and malaria mortality rates increased.
The WHO and the World Bank have stressed that the pandemic has caused the "worst economic crisis since the 1930s", making it harder for people to pay for treatment.
The situation is pushing more than 500 million people into extreme poverty, because they have to pay for these services out of their own pockets.
In October, UN Secretary-General António Guterres said the coronavirus pandemic has plunged more than 100 million people into poverty, with more than four billion people lacking social support.
Makita KP0810
Official Makita dealer.
The powerful motor is ideal for soldering.
Lightweight and great balance.
The use of both standard and bilateral mini-saws.
A simple system for quick installation of blades.
The new ergonomic design of the body, rubber inserts in the handle to reduce vibration on the user's hand.
Three V-shaped grooves for removing different-sized fascias.
The dust removal system is a choice: left or right.
The wife, this is beaver meat.
It's a disgrace.
The flying mice with the pangolins have already had enough, and the jellyfish have begun to take an interest.
Oh, how many more discoveries we can expect from the wonders of the world, such as ants, termites, lemmings, and so on.
Reuters: Taiwan minister cut off from 'Democracy Summit' by White House request
A speech by Taiwan's Minister of Digital Technology Audrey Tang at a panel discussion at the U.S.-organized "Summit on Democracy" was cut off without video, according to a recording of the summit on YouTube.
Reuters, citing sources, said the image was turned off at the request of the White House.
They said the reason was a map showing Taiwan as a separate colour from China, which considers the island to be its territory.
The map, which Ms Tan was showing, was compiled by South African civil society organisation CIVICUS and ranked countries according to their level of civil rights.
Taiwan was marked green as "open", while China, North Korea, Laos and Vietnam were marked red as "closed".
After the minister showed the map, the picture on her side was replaced with a screenshot with the note that the views of the participants "do not necessarily reflect the position of the U.S. government."
China was not invited to the "Democracy Summit".
Reuters sources note that the map shown by the Taiwanese minister could be at odds with Washington's "One China" policy.
One source said the NSC was angry with the State Department after the map was shown, accusing it of treating Taiwan as a separate country.
The Washington-organized "Democracy Summit" took place from December 9 to 10 with the participation of representatives of 110 countries and territories, as well as civil society and charitable organizations.
Russia was not invited to the summit.
During the “zero day” of the summit, the Nobel Peace Prize laureate, the editor-in-chief of Novaya Gazeta, Dmitry Muratov, called for the creation of an international foundation through which money obtained through corruption would be donated to charity.
Earlier today, the deputy secretary of the Russian Security Council, Yury Averianov, stated that the summit was "anti-Russian and anti-Chinese."
They feed you that they are cooking food, and there is all rotten meat everywhere, in fact, there is still meat left in the butcher's shop.
Journalism is the creation of news from nothing.
They boil not meat, but horns and hooves, and get a substance like glue.
The finished product looks like a yellowish semi-transparent strip with almost no smell and is hard, like plastic, and is used as natural gelatin.
In fact, the amount of harmful substances from waste processing is no more than from its decomposition.
But this saves companies a lot of money.
Therefore, a fairy tale about ecology was invented for the Lokhvans, who will also work on collecting rubbish for free in the idea.
My personal contribution to the environment is to refuse to buy unnecessary things and to use things for a long time.
If I go beyond the frame, I don't throw it away, but give it to charity.
Football shorts Jogel Camp Jfs-1120-016, white/black (XL).
Description: The football shorts are perfect for playing football and exercising.
Shorts have a straight, convenient cut.
The wide strap combined with the adjustable strap ensures a comfortable fit.
The fabric has high strength, durability, lightness and good breathability, meeting the requirements of the game at any level.
The updated brand logo is on the left.
Shorts are packaged in a reusable, zip-up pouch.
Stylish appearance, straight cut, wide belt with a cord, durable and long-lasting fabric, good breathability.
Features.
Go into specialties that allow you to work online.
We have many people who are stuck working for their uncle, but abroad.
But because of the exchange rate, it is advantageous for us.
Compared to other countries, we are still poor.
Of course, you will have to learn different tricks, but... the network allows you to not be dependent on the internal labor market.
But our country is creating almost no jobs.
And what they create, you won’t earn much from them.
Dining set "Egoist-Unity" with gold plating (4 items).
The “Royal Childhood” collection is one of the largest and most famous collections of children’s silver in Russia.
It contains many charming models of silver spoons, forks and knives, buttons and buckles, purses and pouches, pitchers and cups.
All children's silver instruments are rigorously quality controlled.
The eco-silver produced directly at the factory is carefully hand-polished with cotton balls, making the products completely safe for children.
Regular use of silver instruments can support the body's natural immune system and even prevent some of the common childhood diseases.
The factory's specialists received a grant to use a complex but very beautiful guillotine technique, which was used by the famous Carl Faberge.
This made it possible to create incredibly vivid and three-dimensional images on the products.
The collection is full of cute characters that will become the child's faithful friends.
Inka Belucha, everything will be fine.
There is another light.
The fibrous tissue regenerates well if all is removed, but the remaining portion will grow.
If it is a pneumonectomy, the second lung will grow over time and work for two.
Try to breathe in full, fathers are stronger than their daughters, their tears are not very pleasant.
Don't regret it too early.
Smile and breathe, breathe...
New Shepard spacecraft with six tourists on board made suborbital flight
The New Shepard spacecraft of Blue Origin, carrying six tourists, made a suborbital flight on Saturday, 11 December.
The journey, which was broadcast on the company's website, lasted for more than ten minutes, after which the capsule with the passengers landed on Earth, TASS reports.
The launch of the launch vehicle was carried out from the launch pad in the area of the American town of Van Horn (Texas).
The ship rose to an altitude of about 100 km, and the cosmonauts found themselves in a state of weightlessness.
The launch vehicle itself landed on the cosmodrome’s pad as standard.
Blue Origin successfully carried out the first suborbital flight of the New Shepard spacecraft with passengers on board on July 20.
FORESTS OF MOSCOW.
Don't lump them all together - bad people do exist, and you may have claims against them for a specific reason...
But what does this have to do with the number of children, age, pension fund and other things?
Write that they are "thieves who did not return the money."
But how many and when to have children is not your business, until they have gathered these children and hung them around your neck.
If this is excluded, then what right do you have to condemn them?
Well, that's just the way education is...
The chosen (by themselves) parents dictate their own rules, openly disregarding the existing ones.
And if this will concern other areas of life, such as the judicial system and so on?
For them, the laws are not written.
And if the father were to implement his method of upbringing and education?
What a bad example for others.
The "Feathered Stars" DESIGN WORKS 2719 embroidery set.
The set includes: Aida 14ct dark blue, muline, sequins, beads, needle, pattern, instructions.
Design Works production began in 1987 and is popular all over the world to this day.
Many of the motifs are worked by the well-known designer Ronald West.
The Design Works cross-stitch kits are equipped with high-quality Aida canvas, 100% cotton muline and No. 24 embroidery needle.
You will also find sets for plastic canvas embroidery, Tobin embroidery - this is embroidery on tablecloths, runners and tablecloths, and much more.
China strengthens prevention and control of COVID-19 in cities where land checkpoints are located
The joint prevention and control mechanism of the State Council of the People's Republic of China issued a circular requiring the strengthening of prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic in cities with land ports of entry, in order to further prevent the importation of the virus from abroad.
According to the circular, people leaving the specified cities must provide a negative nucleic acid test result for COVID-19 taken within 48 hours before departure.
Anyone arriving in a city with a land border crossing must take at least one COVID-19 nucleic acid test on arrival.
The document states that the requirements will apply from the date that the relevant provincial-level administrative units determine and publish the zones of the cities until March 15, 2022.
In addition, it is noted that cities with land border crossings that meet certain criteria may consider the possibility of creating buffer zones for the prevention and control of the COVID-19 epidemic within their jurisdiction.
Taisya Sokolova, as usual, draws Russian women to the Eastern ethnicity by Indian films that are only shown in Russia and are played in cinemas.
In the West, no one paid any attention to this nonsense with the natives.
And how many of these towns and villages have been forgotten and abandoned?
Sontelle Spring Mattress Vivre Castom family, 140x195, article number: 5110704.
The RelaxFoam 2 cm mattress layer consists of aloe latex 3 cm, coconut 2 cm TFK, coconut 2 cm, aloe latex 3 cm, RelaxFoam 2 cm.
The cover is a Splendid knit.
The cotton knit fabric has a special design.
The sole is made of special synthetic threads that provide special strength and softness to the material.
The cellular structure of the weave supports natural thermoregulation and moisture wicking during sleep and rest.
40% cotton, 60% polyester, density 230 g/m2.
Dimax OK Basis mattress, size 130x185.
The spring orthopedic mattress OK Basis is one of the most affordable models in the line.
The practical filler Balance Foam gives the mattress all the necessary orthopedic properties, but at the same time leaves the price within budget.
This product is an optimal combination of price and quality.
Pen Balance is a modern material made from PP.
The filler is hypoallergenic and safe.
That is why the pen is widely used in industry.
Its safety and reliability have been confirmed by a special certificate obtained in Europe, where such requirements are much stricter than in Russia.
Another important quality of the Foam Balance is its orthopedics: the material supports the correct position of the body throughout the night.
Thanks to the pen, the mattress has a medium hardness, so the product is considered to be soft by the manufacturer.
The main load-bearing block in the mattress is SuperSprings.
It is notable for the content of independent springs, here there are 256 elements per square metre.
The practical block can support up to 100 kg on the sleeping place, distributes the load and adapts the surface to the sleeper, strengthening the orthopedic qualities of the foam.
The manufacturer offers the option of a 12 cm or 18 cm spring block without changing the final price.
Please specify your preferences when ordering the store operator.
The mattress is delivered in a knitted cover, along with it the height of the model is 21 cm.
The cover is non-removable.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certificate.
The Arte Lamp A9566AP-1WG from Arte Lamp.
It would be perfect for a room like a living room.
The main part of the lamp is made of metal.
The lighting fixture is available in gold.
The lamps used in the chandelier are with E14 sockets.
The total power allows for approximately 2 m2 to be illuminated.
The manufacturer recommends this lamp for rooms decorated in the "Classic" style.
The Foreign Ministry has reported on the “painful conclusion” in relations between Russia and the United States
Deputy Foreign Minister of Russia Sergei Ryabkov in an interview with Izvestia assessed the prospects of relations between Moscow and Washington.
He noted that the long path of interaction has led to tragic conclusions, and the problems between the two countries did not begin yesterday.
One-sided negative predictability exists, but in terms of some kind of prospects for improving relations, everything is completely unpredictable.
It's a sad conclusion to a long journey that we've been on with this administration, with Trump, with Obama.
The problems started not yesterday," the diplomat said.
According to Ryabkov, the problems are due to the United States’ desire to impose approaches on Russia on a number of issues.
The deputy head of the Foreign Ministry added that he would not have given optimistic forecasts about the prospects for improving relations and would not have expected a change in Washington's position.
He explained that apart from areas such as strategic stability and cyber security, there has been no progress.
Russia, meanwhile, urges the United States to take a responsible approach to international security and hopes that the signals will be heard and that Americans will listen to the arguments of common sense.
Earlier, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov stated at a meeting with US Secretary of State Antony Blinken that Moscow is ready to resume dialogue with the United States.
Virologist warns of risks of COVID nasal spray vaccine outside hospitals
People who have received the nasal vaccine against COVID-19 may develop an allergic reaction and require medical assistance, so it is not advisable to set up vaccination points in airports and shopping centres.
This was reported by TASS, a virologist, corresponding member of the Russian Academy of Sciences, head of the laboratory of bionanotechnology, microbiology and virology of the Novosibirsk State University, Sergei Netesov.
It is easier to set up vaccination points for the nasal vaccine in airports and shopping centres, but I would only do this in the first instance in medical facilities.
The point is that there is a possibility of an allergic reaction to such a vaccine, it is small, but it is desirable that a person sits next to the doctor's office afterwards.
Doctors have special sets of anti-allergy drugs that work within minutes or two, which is sometimes very important," Netesov said.
According to the virologist, it will be possible to think about vaccination in shopping malls when there is experience in using the drug.
He also stressed that when using a nasal vaccine, it is important that it reaches the mucous membrane in the nasal cavity.
However, there is a possibility that the vaccine will not reach its intended destination if the person being vaccinated sneezes after the injection.
The painting by numbers on canvas, anime "Sword that cuts demons" 5426 40x60.
Do you want to feel like a real artist?
The numbers are interesting for both children and adults.
After all, many people love to draw, but sometimes they lack the skills or abilities.
This simple but very engaging activity allows you to relax, realize your creative potential and create masterpieces with your own hands.
A wide range of unusual pictures and "off-the-beaten-track" stories!
We develop topical plots ourselves and try to make the result surprise you!
It's all very simple!
When the outlines are painted on the canvas, they do not "float", they do not dissolve in water.
Each segment is numbered to avoid getting lost in the colours.
The finished picture will be a bright element of the decor, a highlight of the interior, attracting attention from the first glance.
But this picture was not drawn by some artist.
You drew her yourself.
With their own hands!
Serbia produced 2 million doses of the Sputnik V vaccine
The most popular vaccine in Serbia is the Sputnik V.
Serbia produced about 2 million doses of the Russian vaccine Sputnik V, Minister of Innovation and Technological Development of the country Nenad Popovic told TASS.
"The State Institute of Torlak has produced about 2 million doses of the "Sputnik V" vaccine so far, and we expect that at least 4 million will be produced in the coming period," Popovic stated.
According to him, the Russian vaccine is the most popular in Serbia.
In this regard, the republic plans to purchase an additional million doses of the vaccine from Russia.
The Serbian Minister of Innovation and Technological Development also expressed interest in producing the nasal vaccine "Sputnik V" and the drug "Sputnik Light" in the country.
Russian Prime Minister Mikhail Mishustin has reported that Russia has delivered almost two million doses of its home-made coronavirus vaccine “Sputnik V” to Serbia.
Lama, they say, are the true believers.
We can't know whether these are true believers or not.
Each of us would like to be a true believer, and each of us is trying to be one.
But no one should say that about themselves or about those who believe as they do that they are the only true believers.
Because if they can say that they are true believers, then so can others.
The Benartti Prime Orto S1000 145x190 mattress.
The Prime Orto S1000 mattress has different firmness sides, the total height of the mattress is 22 cm.
The maximum load per bed is 150 kg.
The basis of the mattress is the independent spring block "S1000" (1000 springs per one sleeping place).
Each spring is housed in its own fabric pocket, which allows the springs to distribute the body's weight correctly.
An insulating layer of wool has been added to the spring block to separate the mattress fillings and springs.
On one side of the mattress, a layer of coconut coir, 3 cm thick, is added to provide additional firmness and durability.
On the opposite side of the mattress, a layer of coconut coir 3 cm and natural latex 1 cm have been added.
Natural latex has an anatomical effect and wear-resistant properties.
The mattress cover is made from cotton jacquard, printed on an ecologically clean material Hollcon.
The fabric was treated with a special antibacterial Sanitized (Sweden) anti-bacterial coating.
The impregnation provides complete destruction of fungal spores, does not allow the development of microorganisms, dust mites and microbes.
The mattress is equipped with four easy-to-use handles for flipping, as well as aerators for additional ventilation of the mattress layers.
The mattress is additionally reinforced with a frame made of artificial latex, which significantly increases its service life.
Alexander M., Please remind me how the marathon at the 2021 World Championships was held?
Do you see the finish line for the classic style participants in the race?
Attention, the question is what Klevba is doing to the right of Bolshunov and how he wants to get onto the slope if he was running behind the barrel on the bend?
And the "best finisher" over 1,500m and after 50km are two different things.
It's been a long time...
I was, in fact, not even the driver.
He had rights, but he didn't know how to drive.
They proposed to drive 250 km in one direction on the MAZ!
Young, bad, agreed.
The host is nearby, he's drinking water, I'm eating.
First, as king, he took the center!
A column formed behind me.
Missed.
Then the strap broke on the guitar.
Then we were stopped by the police.
The column was organized, and their car broke down.
It needs to be towed.
The owner of the MAZ explained that he was drunk and the driver was inexperienced.
And what kind of drunk are you?
Don't trip, don't fall.
Ahead of us with blinkers on and ahead!
I think it doesn't come out of the ads, and he's hurting.
Pevtsov is saying the same thing: about returning the retirement age.
All budgets have been created taking into account the billions of dollars that were not received by pensioners.
Who is telling them this rubbish?
In the UK, 1239 cases of the Omicron strain of the coronavirus were recorded in one day - RT in Russian
In one day, 1,239 cases of the new Omicron strain of coronavirus have been identified in the UK.
Sky News reports this.
In particular, 1,196 new cases of the "omicron" strain were recorded in England, 38 people fell ill with the new strain in Scotland and five in Northern Ireland.
The total number of people infected with the new strain of Covid-19 in the UK has reached 3,137.
Earlier, scientists from the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine predicted in a pessimistic forecast that by April, 75,000 people could die in England due to the outbreak of the coronavirus caused by the "omicron" strain.
Peskov warned of the suffering of western countries that are introducing anti-Russian sanctions
Russian President’s press secretary Dmitry Peskov commented on the possible introduction of anti-Russian sanctions in the event of continued “aggressive actions” against Ukraine, including the alleged “invasion” of the country’s territory.
“It is impossible to introduce restrictions against Russia and not suffer from it yourself,” the official representative of the Kremlin stated on the Rossiya 1 television channel.
Peskov says this is "understood by everyone in the world."
Earlier it was reported that the United States is considering the possibility of introducing anti-Russian sanctions in the energy sector as an extreme measure.
In addition, Washington and the European Union are planning to introduce restrictions that will make it more difficult to convert rubles into dollars for Russian banks and the Russian Direct Investment Fund.
At the same time, the head of Sberbank, German Gref, is sure that this is impossible.
From people with common sense - respectively, common sense comments!
Something about these simple recipes already makes me gag.
Apparently, the ideas have run out.
Even in the distant past, my mother baked delicious pies and cakes, and it never occurred to me to compare a piece of bread smeared with jam to a cake.
Ksenia, you don’t need to report anything to my mind, my mind must figure it out on its own!
"The inability of the mind separated from the Spirit to perceive" - what are you talking about?
Imagine you have to explain it to a child who doesn't know how to think, how would you do it?!
(Please note that children under 3-5 years old still have open channels of communication with the subconscious, and the child may know more than you!)
New Caledonia residents reject independence from France
According to the final results of the third independence referendum in New Caledonia, the overwhelming majority of participants refused to leave France.
This was reported by the French television channel BFM.TV on December 12.
96.5% of those who voted said no to independence.
3.51% of the archipelago's population supported independence from France.
The results of 2.99% of ballots were annulled.
Turnout on the day was very low: around 55% of the archipelago's population turned out to vote.
According to experts, the low turnout is explained by the separatists' calls to boycott the referendum due to the coronavirus.
Paris has refused to move the referendum date.
In October 2020, the residents of New Caledonia voted against independence from France in a referendum.
A referendum on independence was held in the region in 2018.
Most of the residents supported the archipelago remaining part of France.
New Caledonia is almost 20,000 kilometres from mainland France.
In 1853, France declared New Caledonia its possession.
About 270,000 people live on the archipelago, which has a special administrative and territorial status.
A 1998 agreement between Paris and the New Caledonia administration allows the region to hold a referendum on its independence every two years.
Boris, if you don't know the history, don't write.
The name of the city of Arsk is derived from the Bulgarian-Tatar word “artysh” (elderberry).
The Udmurts (as they are called in Tatar) live in the northern areas of the Baltazin and Kukmor districts.
The Udmurts are good, hardworking people, they have preserved their language, they live in friendship with the Tatars, and they know 3-4 languages.
Victor, I don’t know your age, but I want to tell you that the Motherland will not abandon you.
They throw idiots who are shouting "good slogans".
I am saying this to you with full confidence, based on my life experience.
Don't piss in the well, you might have to drink!
WHO preliminarily considers omicron less dangerous than delta
The World Health Organization (WHO) has preliminarily determined that "omicron" is less dangerous than the "delta" strain of the coronavirus.
However, there are data on the reduced effectiveness of vaccines against the new variant of COVID-19.
As of December 9, omicron has been registered in 63 countries.
"Preliminary data and a significantly altered antigenic profile of the Omicron strain suggest a reduced effectiveness of the vaccine against infection and transmission of the variant.
Preliminary findings from South Africa suggest that it (the "severity of the disease" - rare) may be less severe than the "delta" variant, the World Health Organization said in a technical bulletin.
The organization notes that all registered cases of infection with "omicron" in the EU have so far been mild or asymptomatic.
However, the new strain, according to preliminary data, is spreading faster than the “Delta”.
Two cases of infection with the Omicron strain have been registered in Russia.
They were "previously immunized," the Gamaleya Center said.
The head of the Federal Service for Surveillance on Consumer Rights Protection and Human Well-Being, Anna Popova, stated that there are no reliable data on whether the new coronavirus variant is less dangerous than others.
In fact, the lack of sun for us southerners is very critical.
In ten days spent in Petersburg, somewhere in November, we saw the sun for the first time when our returning plane flew over the clouds.
Then I realised what I had been missing all those years in the wonderful Peter.
Unforgettable jeep tours in the Caucasus:
To learn what you didn’t know before is to drink in the space with your eyes, mouth and skin!
Those who see only water in the ocean
The one on the ground does not notice the mountains.
Your world of adventures +7 905 989 9172 What'sApp
Siberian Expeditions - we can even ruin your worst mood!
Svetlana S., not-a-such - they don't give in.
If your beloved, with whom you are going to spend the rest of your life, does not meet your requests, then he is a parasite who is not willing to give back as much as he takes.
The problem with women is that they are slowly but surely putting everything on themselves.
And who is to blame if she caught herself in the act?
Four scenarios for Zelensky in Ukraine
Former Verkhovna Rada deputy Vadim Denisenko listed four scenarios for President of Ukraine Volodymyr Zelensky in 2022.
According to him, the head of state may remain without the support of the West, and possibly make compromises on Donbass.
On Sunday, 12 December, Denysenko wrote about this on his blog on the website "Glavred".
The first option, which Denysenko called an "ideal storm," assumes that the key Western countries will stop supporting Ukraine, reaching an agreement on the country's future without its participation.
Such a development will contribute to a deep crisis that Ukraine may face in 2023.
"At the same time, there is a decrease in the prices of key products that we traditionally export ... internal protests and opposition to the authorities by key FPGs (financial and industrial groups. - Ed.) ", - added the former parliamentarian.
According to Denisenko, there is another scenario for the development of the situation - "a war against everyone."
This forecast will come true in the event of high political turbulence, when the Ukrainian authorities will face a number of problems.
As a result of such a situation, the leadership of Ukraine may be forced to make concessions on Donbass, which could lead to a confrontation within the country.
By the end of the summer, Zelensky’s position will weaken, the likelihood of such a situation, according to a former deputy, is up to 50-55%.
The third scenario for the development of the situation in Ukrainian politics is a confrontation between the groups of people who are not in agreement with Zelensky and the President, which would result in the seizure of control over the power bloc and the implementation of “populist initiatives”.
In this scenario, Zelensky will begin “restructuring of power,” added Denysenko.
Another scenario is to turn Zelensky into a “father of the nation”.
This may be brought about by some event that will be a major shock to society.
"The event should be large enough to cause a reaction from our partners and to increase support for Ukraine," Denysenko said.
Such a development of the situation is possible as a result of a natural disaster, a technological catastrophe or aggressive actions of Russia, believes the former deputy.
At the same time, the Russian side has already rejected any possibility of an “attack” on Ukraine.
In Moscow, it was noted that it was the Ukrainian authorities, NATO and the United States that were increasing military activity near the Russian borders.
Earlier, on November 11, the data of the sociological group “Rating” showed that the rating of the Ukrainian president fell to record low levels, reaching 19.3%.
It is the lowest rating since he was elected head of state.
Analysts predicted a situation in which, in the event of the upcoming presidential election, 21.8% of voters would vote for Zelensky, while 14.5% would vote for the former president of the country, Petro Poroshenko.
At the same time, only 19.3% of those surveyed expressed support for the president.
KAISER Sena (74182) soul system
The KAISER Sena (74182) spiritual system is one of the best choices in this category.
This brand is popular for its quality and durability of work, which is also confirmed by numerous customer reviews on third-party Internet resources.
When you purchase this product from us, you also receive a guarantee from us on the quality and functionality of the product.
We deliver by transport companies throughout Russia and to any region.
In the event of any defects being found, we will happily refund the full cost you have paid.
When calling the operator, you can get a personal discount on the product.
Please leave a review of your use.
Thank you for the story about the great athlete, I didn’t know that Elena Shushunova had died, it is very sad to learn this.
I remember how I was rooting for her at the Olympics in Seoul, for us, residents of Primorsky Krai, it was a live broadcast, real time.
Such a frenzy of emotions, I remember the joy when Elena won.
They also celebrated the other victories, as they cheered for Salnikov, for the footballers, for all the then Soviet athletes.
I once saw a documentary about one of the Central American countries, and there the cucumbers were loaded onto the ship like barrels.
The potatoes were enormous.
I myself have worked many times in the past on the harvest and loading of cucumbers in the Astrakhan region and have never seen cucumbers weighing more than a pound.
I buy cucumbers weighing 4-5 kg right off the vine and no earlier than the beginning of August.
A balconette bra with soft crochet cups (size: 90E, colour: beige, composition: 90% polyamide, 10% elastane, article: 12008).
A suspension balcony with soft-cushioned chairs on a frame.
The bottom of the cup is reinforced with an inelastic transparent plastic.
The side inner part of the cup, in the area of the bra closure, is reinforced with non-elastic fabric in the fold, without additional seams for comfort.
This element allows the fabric to not stretch.
The richness of the embroidery can be appreciated through the décolletage and under the breasts.
Vertical ridges on the side panels of the one-layer microfiber fabric prevent the fabric from creasing at larger sizes.
The article was very bad, mean, poisonous.
They went to people who had nothing to do with them.
But now, many people are interested in splitting atoms.
I hope that those commenting with honor and integrity have all the facts and are experts in all things.
In Moscow in the evening, one will think a hundred times whether to go to the store alone, the migrants are everywhere, their crowds.
They consider themselves the owners.
And are you really serious about children's allowances and pensions?
Advice is paid for up to 3 years, pensions are 12,000, someone wrote about dentistry, and prostheses have been paid for a long time and are very expensive in our country.
People are like people from another planet.
In France, it's bad, but in Russia, it's good?
The Beautyson Sense Hard S600 mini Sint mattress has a compact structure, comfortable elasticity and firmness, wear-resistant and durable properties.
The "Beutison" brand product from the "Sense" series is designed for the rehabilitation of people suffering from joint and circulatory system diseases.
The construction provides uniform load distribution across the surface and a distinct comfort effect.
The BeautySense Hard S600 Mini S600 mini with reduced spring height is the foundation of the BeautySense Hard S600 Mini.
As internal fillers, Beautyson uses spandex, coconut coir and polyurethane.
The spacer serves as an intermediate isolating layer between the soft materials and the springs.
The orthopedic pen with a carbon coating is decorated on the surface of the figure carving, which provides a micro-massage effect.
Coconut coir is a hypoallergenic material that gives the mattress high moisture and air permeability characteristics.
The mattress cover is made from a dense jacquard fabric with synthetic fibres.
The material is strong and durable, does not fray and does not require special care.
The poet arrested for the action on Red Square: "They give 10 days for a quote by Yevtushenko, here it is, the power of poetry!"
On the first day of the week, Alexander Volchenkov, a 21-year-old poet, was arrested for ten days.
An HSE student was detained on Red Square with a placard with the hashtag #poetyvrossiiboleechtopoety.
This quote is attributed to writer Yevgeny Yevtushenko.
A protocol was drawn up against Alexander for an administrative violation of the procedure for holding a public event.
He was first detained on January 23 on Pushkin Square at a rally in support of Alexei Navalny.
"The goal was to draw attention to poetry in general, unfortunately, interest in it, unfortunately, has disappeared, and the decline of the general culture in Russia is also a small hope to inspire unknown poets to write their poems under this hashtag on the Internet," Alexander explains.
We have spoken to the young poet to establish the circumstances of his arrest and to provide more detail on the message of his poem.
How did the police officers treat you on this occasion and in the past?
What did the department ask you about your action?
This time the officers were more correct, the detention was as minimal as possible, courteous, as if this sounded ridiculous in a certain context of the word.
At Pushkinskaya, the OMONs were taken and taken hard.
They asked the standard questions about motives.
When they heard about it, they, in principle, looked at it, if not approvingly, then understandingly.
Apart from the monkey being blown all over the place, everything else was done impeccably, but I knew where I was going.
And if after the action under this hashtag people start writing their poems, even a few people, I will not waste these 10 days.
According to the protocol, you should speak the language of the Tumba-Yumba tribe alone.
At public and official events, they speak in the language of the surroundings so that everyone can understand what happened in the Bundestag on 25 September 2001, or in their native language through a translator.
This is the protocol and nothing more, by the way, Angela Merkel speaks Russian perfectly and yet resorts to the help of a translator.
And at official events, stenographers still take notes the old-fashioned way, with a pen, and a stenographer doesn’t have to know several languages.
I don't want to say many words, so say no!
But there is so much water.
Well, to go as a tourist for six months "to the Andes, then to Nepal."
Before converting all assets into liquid shares.
And gradually sell these shares, opening an account in any bank in the world.
To sell not in dollars, but in a less dependent on the US currency, for example, Swiss francs.
And then, after that, to file for divorce from America.
However, this is not all that keeps Americans in the US.
They are confident that the US is better than anywhere else.
They grow them like that.
The Hansgrohe Quattro three-outlet (15930180) mechanism.
Collection: Quattro; Type: concealed installation mechanism; Purpose: for mixer, for bath, for washbasin; Built-in systems: yes; Installation type: built-in (in the wall); Body material: brass; Concealed installation mechanism: included; Number of installation holes: 1; Country of origin of the brand: Germany; Manufacturer's article number: 15930180; Barcode: 4011097345239.
Additional information: pressure regulator required; set contents: ceramic cartridge, sealing nut; 3 consumers; possible simultaneous connection of 2 consumers (shower heads); suitable for all Quattro external parts sets; water consumption: 65 l/min.
Researchers say potatoes help fight age-related diseases
The study found that potatoes are rich in vitamins and minerals that help improve blood circulation and lower cholesterol levels.
The root contains vitamins of the B group, vitamin C, phosphorus, potassium, magnesium, riboflavin, folic and pantothenic acids.
All these elements help the body's systems to function.
In addition, potatoes help in the fight against age-related problems.
Thanks to its high fibre content, it is beneficial to the gastrointestinal tract, and regular use may also help in the prevention of hypertension and atherosclerosis.
However, for the greatest benefit, the root vegetable should be roasted or boiled, rather than fried in oil.
The Daily Express previously warned that potatoes can be dangerous for diabetics, as well as other high-GI foods.
These are products with carbohydrate content that are rapidly broken down into sugars, such as sugar, sweet non-alcoholic beverages, white rice and white bread.
In early December, Kommersant warned of a possible shortage of Russian table potatoes, noting a reduction in their production in personal small-scale farms and an increase in processing capacity.
According to market participants, the current shortage of products can only be covered by imports.
Lostfilm, lordfilm and other pirates have been removed from Yandex’s release
Candidates for the exit
In 2015, the copyright holders from the RAEC/Media cluster compiled a list of the 100 largest pirate websites in the country, and most of them ceased to exist, says the director of the Institute of Internet Research Karen Kazaryan.
But some - Kinogo, Lostfilm, Filmix - have managed to survive, he adds, thanks in part to regular domain name changes.
For example, on Lostfilm, which is available in search results as both Yandex and Google, you can watch the pirate copies of the Netflix series “Squid Game” and “Love” by director Anna Melikyan - the original series of the largest Russian video service ivi (part of AIV).
On Kinogo, which is also available on search engines, you can watch the animated novelty "Encanto", but, judging by the quality of the video, it is a so-called screen (a pirated copy of the film made in a cinema).
Filmix, which can also be found through search engines, has the series “Univer. 10 Years Later” of the TNT channel (part of “Gazprom-media”).
Svetlana M., sorry, but I would not care if the son was offended by his mother or not.
If we have any problems, it's better not to meet at all, to leave a note on the way.
Of course, it's good that such things don't happen very often.
The 135I GI1265 coffee machine with soft cups and a frameless front panel.
The T-shaped backrest is reinforced from the inside with crossed elastic cotton and Lycra.
The bustier is made from microfibre in combination with a mesh for breathability.
Mugs with insulation made from hemp-containing fabric for a comfortable fit.
The unique design of the Magiclift (crossing under the breasts and along the décolletage supporting inserts) for lifting, separating and supporting the breasts.
The wide, comfortable straps on the insole with micro-grooves are adjusted from behind.
Ludmila, China now has the most advanced space technology.
Russia is already hopelessly behind.
"This idea developed by the Poles" - it would be more accurate to say that Poland merely adapted the idea of 1776, but developed it quite effectively.
In fact, the slogan “Outskirts are not Russia” appeared in 1848.
In general, this does not change the essence.
I watched her interview, the girl said that her biggest dream is to grow wings, and her dad is constantly teasing her.
Well, all this is very questionable.
Well, she got into a university, what next?
Maytoni MOD081WL-L13G3K Tessara wall sconce.
A wide circle, framed by "molecules" of light, provides the most even and bright illumination of the space.
"Atomic" or "molecular" design, reflecting the essence and natural nature of each object, is not losing its relevance and allows you to highlight accents in the interior.
One of the distinctive features of such lamps is their weightlessness.
By means of thin, almost invisible cables, which are regulated by height, the impression is created that the chandelier is floating in the air.
The metallic gold fittings and matte-white mini-pendant lights will easily complement any palette, while the suspended lamp and floor lamp in the collection will make a ready-made ensemble for lighting the living room, bedroom and hallway.
Well, on the taste and colour, you know.
I really liked Tarhun, not the current one, of course.
The juices were very tasty, and they were served in bottles from high-quality glass cylinders.
Three portions of syrup is too much for my taste.
Two were fine.
Dimax Micro Ultimate mattress, 160x190
Orthopedic spring mattress Micro Ultimate.
The model is convenient because it has two different softnesses – high hardness and slightly above average.
Only high-quality and premium fillers were used in the product, which have proven themselves in the best possible way.
Springs: The center of the model is fitted with a block of independent springs “micro-package”.
This means that each bed has 2000 spirals that work autonomously.
It is their functioning that gives a unique point adjustment.
The "micropackage" is the most high-frequency of all the variety of Dimaks spring blocks, so it has a pronounced orthopedic effect and is considered premium.
Fillers: The top and bottom of the springs are made of a combination of coir and natural latex.
The only difference is the order of the tiles.
If one surface is latex, the other is coconut coir.
Such a tandem of fillers has long been considered classic, since it provides the mattress with not only orthopedic, but also anatomical properties.
If the corset provides the right support for the back, then the latex provides a surface adaptation to the human body.
Cover: The model is delivered in a folded tricot cover with Aloe Vera.
It can be made either portable or fixed, according to the client’s wishes.
The overall height of the device is 27 cm, the recommended load on the bed is 170 kg.
Warranty and safety: the warranty period is 3 years.
The mattress received all the necessary certificates and documents confirming its full safety and reliability in operation.
The orthopedic foam used in the mattress has a CertiPUR certificate.
Estonian scientists will search for life on Venus
Massachusetts Institute of Technology, in collaboration with Tartu Observatory and other research institutions and companies, is preparing three missions to Venus to search for signs of life in its atmosphere, the "Actual Camera" reported on Sunday.
The goal of the five-year missions is to assess Venus's habitability and then search for life there.
For the project, Tartu scientists have proposed tools for measuring the acidity and oxygen content of Venus clouds.
Previously, it was thought that Venus' clouds, the closest planet to Earth, were too acidic to support life, but it is likely that Venus was originally a terrestrial planet.
A sample from Venus should arrive during the third mission.
If we find life there, the main question will be whether it is like life on Earth or different.
If it is very similar, then it will be obvious that life on Earth did not begin on Earth.
If it is different, then it may be more likely that life began on Earth," said Mikkhel Paulus, head of the Estonian team of the "Venus Life Finder" project.
A hat, not a phone...
For a year, and all the price...
I've had enough of this Chinese nonsense...
They can't make a good phone...
At least, my Samsung has already survived three such falls (my friends have already thrown them away) and it will survive again!
Metaverses will change the Russian business
The metaverse theme has become popular this fall, when Mark Zuckerberg announced that Facebook would become Meta.
For the market, this event was a significant signal: the largest player confirmed the development of a new format of digital interaction between people.
Therefore, business in Russia, as well as all over the world, will invest in the creation of their own metaverses and their subsequent monetization.
Metaverses should be viewed as a continuation of the objectively existing trends.
On the one hand, the trend towards creating remote interactions in the conditions of the pandemic, because people are tired of isolation and restrictions.
On the other hand, this is the result of businesses striving to develop ecosystems and adapt their operations to them.
The third is that they are a logical continuation of the trend of digitizing assets, where any rights, securities, works of art and even money move into a digital format.
Anna, you are right, changing your diet is a conscious process.
When you start eating properly, you no longer want to eat anything too fatty and unhealthy.
Of course, we will have the traditional olive tree and fish under the table, but no one is forcing me to eat it all at once.
You can eat it by the spoonful, try it and it's enough.
After all, there are ten days ahead, and you can prepare any tasty and healthy dishes.
And how much effort, time and resources it took her to train.
And after performing five quarter jumps, she was left without gold.
And she also understands that four years before the next Olympics she won't be able to do it, i.e. she will never be an Olympic champion.
And the one who did not engage in sports or cannot imagine all the circles of hell that she has gone through, SHOULD NOT BE PUNISHED.
British economist unable to predict for 2022
British economist Jim O'Neill was unable to make a forecast for 2022, as he believes such attempts will fail.
He wrote about it in an article for Project Syndicate.
An expert believes that the next year will be full of unpredictability and any trend can change the course.
The most important factor is the coronavirus pandemic, he believes, and inflation is in second place.
O'Neill also admitted he didn't know if the price hike was temporary or not.
As a specialist pointed out, even before the pandemic, it was clear that "the world of central banks' infinite generosity has outlived itself" and it was time to return to the relationship where interest rates adjusted for inflation would correlate with expected growth rates of GDP.
O'Neill noted that in the face of the pandemic, continued ultra-loose monetary policy could, according to some experts, lead to a new inflation surge.
In addition, attention should be paid to the issue of productivity growth, as well as poverty levels and climate change, O'Neill concluded.
Earlier, the head of the Global Research Department of Open Investment, Mikhail Shulgin, reported that positive expectations for the dollar in 2022 remain, but the potential for growth will be less significant.
Among the risks for the dollar, Shulgin named the monetary and credit policy of the Fed, the dynamics of oil prices and concerns in the wake of the coronavirus pandemic.
She had to agree.
But one thing is comforting: if you compare yourself to five years ago, there were fewer containers.
Now it is better.
Progress is there, only slow.
There is another problem: there are many environmental initiatives in cities, but people don’t know about them.
Any kind of eco taxi that collects waste from the house.
The point of accepting second-hand goods is that it benefits the marginals.
Few people put glass and metal there.
And the author...
Pork sausages with cats?
Low-quality chocolate in the USSR?
Well, they are not as tasty as Doshirak, I understand...
But I would turn over the Soviet confectionery with white filling now.
There are none left.
They don’t release “The Pilot”, and “Romashka” is not at all the same...
Car mats EVA (square) for Hyundai Tucson I (2004-2010).
The car mats EVA are made from high-quality materials produced in Russia.
The surface of the mats is made up of rectangles.
The thickness of the mats is 10 mm, the depth of the cells is 5-6 mm.
The mats do not absorb or allow moisture to pass through.
All the dirt is evenly distributed across the cells, keeping the surface clean.
The material used to make the mats is elastic, wear-resistant, and odourless.
It maintains its properties in the temperature range from -50 to 50 °C.
The mats are easy to care for and are suitable for year-round use.
The EVA sole covers the standard carpet, covering the left foot area.
The rear tunnel is covered by a carpet.
The canopy is made from super-strong automotive webbing.
Dimax Practical Basis Plus V13 180x220 cm mattress
The Dimax (Dimax) Practic Basis Plus 13 mattress consists of a single type of filling.
This is a 13 cm-high artificial leather plate.
Because of the characteristics of the material, the mattress has a symmetrical average firmness on both sides.
The item is lined with a jacquard cover with a fastener on a comfortable layer, detachable or non-detachable, depending on the choice.
PPU is a hygienic material with anatomical properties.
The main advantages of artificial latex (LLDPE) are characteristics similar to those of the natural analogue, but at a lower cost.
Artificial latex is elastic and elastic, but, unlike natural materials, it has greater rigidity.
It forms the anatomical surface of the mattress with quality support, which ensures a comfortable sleep.
The material is well ventilated, does not accumulate moisture and does not cause allergic reactions.
The strength of this filler ensures the durability and wear resistance of the mattress.
A quality mattress that is not afraid of temperature changes.
Anatomical, inexpensive and temperature-resistant, this mattress is ideal for furnishing a bed in a country house or a cottage.
Its strengths also include a universal medium firmness and a maximum load of 100 kg, which makes this mattress suitable for most user categories.
Russians have given car dealers around 4.5% of the country's GDP
According to the results of 10 months of 2021, Russians spent 2.784 trillion rubles on the purchase of new cars, which is 28% more than in the same period of the previous year, according to the statistics of the Russian Automotive Market Research (RAMP) agency.
To understand the scale - about the same amount (about 3 trillion rubles) was spent by the state to support citizens and the economy during the coronavirus pandemic.
In September last year, President Vladimir Putin said that such a sum was comparable to more than 4.5% of the country's gross domestic product (GDP) for 2020.
In terms of sales in the Russian market, the Korean brand Kia is leading.
Over the course of this year, he managed to sell cars worth 32.57 billion rubles, which is almost 24% more than the previous year.
The growth of the related Hyundai brand is even more significant - more than 35%, and the revenue from the sale of cars is estimated at 27.93 billion rubles.
In the lead, this brand is in terms of increasing the average price of a car - for Hyundai it grew by almost 21% over the year to 1.94 million rubles - the dynamics of price growth was stronger only for Changan, Chery, Geely and Mercedes-Benz.
At the same time, the volume of sales of Korean brands did not grow so significantly: according to the statistics of the Automobile Manufacturers Committee of the Association of European Business in Russia, Kia sold 9.4% more cars in the same period than the previous year.
Hyundai - almost 12%.
The Japanese Toyota is in the lead in terms of sales volume in monetary terms - Russians spent 27.55 billion roubles on cars of this brand over the past 10 months, which is 14% more than a year ago.
Following the Japanese are Mercedes-Benz with a figure of 26.61 billion rubles (+75%) - the volume of sales of the German premium brand increased by 37% and the average price of the car (by almost 28%, to 8.2 million rubles).
“Mercedes-Benz is experiencing both a good increase in sales and a weighted average price - more, for example, than BMW - which is why the financial capacity is growing as well, explained the head of the National Agency for Public Inspection, Tatiana Arabadzhi.
Chinese brands have also significantly increased their financial capacity this year, demonstrating fantastic sales growth rates."
The Russian Lada demonstrates average growth in income dynamics (plus 28%), and Russians spent 22.94 billion rubles on cars of this brand in 10 months.
At the level of last year, companies with a financial capacity are those whose sales in units fell in 2021: in particular, Volkswagen, Mitsubishi and Nissan.
UAZ is in the red - Russians spent 12 billion rubles on off-road vehicles and pick-ups of this brand in 10 months, compared to 12.4 billion rubles a year earlier.
Against the backdrop of problems with the supply of auto components and production disruptions affecting the entire global automotive industry, automakers continue to continuously adjust prices - AvtoVAZ raised the prices of Lada models seven times during the year, the last price hike (by 8-10 thousand rubles) took place at the end of November.
Regularly rewrite their price lists for their own products and those of other car manufacturers.
The volume of the Russian automotive market in monetary terms will continue to grow, in addition to the shortage of cars, inflation is also contributing to this, as well as the desire of automakers to make up for past losses, experts believe.
In the conditions of a shortage of cars, I think that many car manufacturers even managed to partially pass on the costs of previous periods, which they could not include in the price of cars earlier,
Vladimir Bespalov, an analyst at VTB Capital, says: -
I think that financially, the automakers are doing very well, maintaining high margins on sales."
An indirect indicator of this is the rate of growth in the cost of cars, which is being observed in 2021, the expert explains.
In the long run, the market will grow both in terms of quantity and in terms of money, but mainly due to inflation and the complexity of the machines themselves, predicts Bespalov.
As the number of opportunities to raise prices increases, the opportunities to raise prices will become limited.
In monetary terms, the Russian automotive market will continue to grow in the future, even if the growth in the cost of cars slows down, notes independent automotive consultant Sergei Burgazliev.
Taking into account the increased demand and insufficient supply, car manufacturers are now trying to get the highest profit from each sold car, notes Burgazliev. -
It is not expected that the volume of machine production will increase in the near future, and in Russia, the enthusiasm is further fueled by citizens' uncertainty about the future.
In the face of the situation on the market, cars have turned out to be a good investment - a car bought a year ago, even with mileage, can now be sold for more than the original cost, an expert notes.
Biden has spoken about the possibility of US troops being sent to Ukraine in the event of a Russian invasion
The US leadership never considered sending American troops to Ukraine in the event of a "Russian invasion."
The president of the United States, Joe Biden, made this statement.
"Never was such a plan," the White House chief said in response to a question from a journalist about whether the United States had abandoned the idea.
Biden noted that if the situation around Ukraine escalates, Russia will face economic consequences.
He also stressed that the United States and NATO do not have the obligation to use military force to protect Ukraine in the event of escalation.
The American leader also stated that the possibility of using American troops unilaterally to defend Ukraine is not on the agenda.
Biden explained that if Russia invaded Ukraine, the United States would send forces to Eastern European NATO countries (Bulgaria, Hungary, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Romania, Slovakia, Czech Republic and Estonia).
"We're going to have to send more American and NATO troops to the eastern flank, B9 - all the NATO countries that we have a sacred obligation to defend them from any attack from Russia," Biden said.
Earlier, the Russian president’s press secretary, Dmitry Peskov, noted that Moscow does not have any intentions to invade Ukraine’s territory.
Moscow, on the other hand, sees the problem in the combat use of Turkish drones by Kiev, as well as the fact that "American weapons are getting closer to our territory."
I immediately leave such interviews.
If they already want to force me to listen to screams, wait for hours, drink an incomprehensible soup and wash another cup - it's terrible to imagine what it will be like at work.
I will find a normal place, without the middleman, where you can immediately talk to the boss.
Promtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 100x185 cm mattress
The average height springless mattress of the Proomtex-Orient Monolit Combi 16 model is made of alternating layers of natural latex and coconut coir.
One side is medium-hard, the other is moderately hard.
The elegant white cover is made of jacquard and is completed with a lightning bolt around the perimeter.
Two types of filler.
The sandwich model consists of eight layers of fillings.
Between the sheets of plastic, thin sheets of coconut coir are laid.
The layered structure of the mattress has increased wear resistance, durability and load-bearing capacity.
Natural latex is a dense, elastic, and breathable material by its characteristics.
The filler holds its shape and quickly rebounds after impact.
Coconut coir strengthens the product and has naturally antimicrobial properties.
The combination of these two materials allows for the creation of a load-bearing orthopedic bed that will serve customers for many years.
Universality and orthopedic support.
Mattresses are suitable for people of different body types and ages.
The medium-hard surface is universal with a balanced combination of orthopedics and comfort.
The reverse side of the model is less comfortable for soft tissues, but has more pronounced orthopedic properties.
A moderately firm mattress is more relevant for those who need to 'unwind' their spines and get a good night's sleep.
The mattress is ideal for one person or a couple.
The latter are especially likely to appreciate the presence of a stable surface and the absence of the "wave" effect, where vibrations on one side of the mattress can be transmitted to the other, disturbing a sleeper in their sleep.
Molbert table "Studio" 20*24*54(65) cm for canvas 40 cm.
The desk "Studio" with a height-adjustable upper shelf.
It will suit small-sized canvases.
The material is natural wood, varnished.
It will be convenient for both beginners and professional artists.
Smooth angle adjustment.
It is equipped with a rack for sheets and tablets.
The top holder is securely fixed in place.
The maximum height of a molier is 65 cm, and the maximum size of the canvas is 40 cm.
If a fraudster calls from such a number, like a "Ministry of Internal Affairs employee" or some other law enforcement agency, then it is ineffective to hang up right away, and it is unlikely that you will be able to add them to the blacklist.
Because to confirm his lie about his connection to the security forces, he quickly repeats the call and continues to scare and persuade.
We need more useful advice for the people.
That's nonsense.
I can't believe it.
They no longer know what to come up with, who to accuse.
The Queen reached it.
And the most important thing, they say, is that everyone is to blame, except the very worst...
It would be simpler to leave people alone from coercion, of course, if we cared about our people.
Maybe all the strains of the virus will disappear...
As in Japan... before the elections, the influence and infection rate decreased...
The "Assort No. 2" wool set is 100% Merino wool, with a weight of 4x10 g.
Wool spinning as a craft began eight thousand years ago, but it was very difficult to find animal wool, and even more so, coloured wool.
But now, wow!
We present a thin natural wool for knitting from a Russian manufacturer, which does not require you to run around the forest or pasture.
The unique properties of wool for felting allow for the creation of bright and one-of-a-kind items.
For example, you can make a little toy for yourself or your baby, appliqués for creativity, jewelry, interior decorations, and even clothing and accessories.
Imagine a pair of fluffy sheep on your desk, a small photo frame on the wall, a colourful necklace that would look great with a new dress, or unique home slippers that nobody else will have...
Bring your ideas to life by "melting" this wonderful wool!
Maria Kartazova, what does that mean?
I don’t voice my thoughts, I mentally curse you all.
I mentally decapitate everyone who has not given way to me, I mentally send them to the sewer and burn all the cars that are in my way, mentally!
And I can even smile at you.
But I remember that the thought is material!
Peter, the Second, did not sign a single death sentence during his reign.
Even the likes of Koba and his gang.
And bloody Sunday is already a Bolshevik invention.
Mattress Comfort Line Hard Classic TFK 180x190.
The mattress is firm on both sides.
Natural coconut coir latex is hypoallergenic and adds the necessary firmness and elasticity to the mattress.
The independent TFK spring block (512 springs per sleeping place) provides unique comfort and correct support for the spine during sleep.
A 200-gram hemp jacquard scarf
The hollocone provides protection and comfort.
Maximum load per sleeping place: 130 kg.
My horse.
A pony house with accessories, 6 pieces in a display.
The charming pony lives in a cosy, folding pink cottage.
If you open up the cottage, one of its halves can be turned into a kitchen, while the other half can be used as a dining room, with a table laid out for guests.
Ponies have big, beautiful eyes, and their manes and tails can be brushed with a comb.
The set includes: a 9 cm doll, a comb, a house (2 halves), a built-in table (2 parts), a kitchen (2 parts), accessories: scissors (2 parts), a heart-shaped cake (2 parts), a juice bottle, 2 glasses, a teapot, a cup and a saucer.
MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS 90x190x27, weight 27.9 kg.
Alternating layers of latex and hard coconut coir provide the effect of improved body support.
The MIELLA Duet Cocos-Latex DS mattress can withstand a load of up to 170 kg per sleeping place.
However, there is no wave effect: the husband and wife lying next to each other do not topple towards each other regardless of the difference in weight.
The materials used to make the model were subjected to rigorous quality control.
They are ventilated, do not dry out, do not absorb odors.
A unique microclimate is created thanks to the full circulation of air, which promotes healthy rest.
High-strength thermo-adhesive was used to bond the parts.
Sokurov's student film wins European 'Oscars' for best editing
The Russian film "Beating Hearts" nominated for the "Oscar" award won the award of the European Film Academy (it is also called the "European Oscar") in the "Best Editing" nomination, reports "Moskovsky Komsomolets".
The online voting by the jury, which was complicated by the epidemiological situation, praised the outstanding skill of the film's creators.
This time, the maximum number of awards went to the film "Where Are You Going, Aida?" by Jasmila Žbanić (Bosnia and Herzegovina).
The main character of the film is a translator on a UN mission who is trying to save her family during the war in Yugoslavia.
As for the drama "Holding Hands", directed by Kira Kovalenko (a graduate of Alexander Sokurov's master class), this film tells about the complex relationship between a powerful father and the children who want to break free from their father's guardianship in North Ossetia.
Earlier it was announced that this film was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film.
As regular friendly meetings between the presidents of Russia, Azerbaijan and Turkey show, in my opinion, you are, to put it mildly, not in the right place.
Only yesterday, the President of Azerbaijan approved the opening of a joint Azerbaijani-Russian KamAZ plant.
